Mojo,80,"The groups power has always come from its Spice Girls-like ability to form a massive unit of self-actualization, and the peppy 7/27 has no shortage of that, both lyrically and musically."
AllMusic,75,"The sassy girl-power proclamations and gleefully unsubtle double-entendres that elevated the groups 2015 debut, Reflection, are largely pushed aside for mid-tempos about romance and intimacy. Deep, vulnerable, personal--these were some of the quintets stated goals for 7/27. Its not a bad look by any means."
The Guardian,70,"7/27 mostly rises to the occasion."
The Observer (UK),70,"Ultimately, while 7/27 isn't quite as loose or as fun as one might hope, Fifth Harmony prove they can balance youthful swagger with grown-up sophistication."
PopMatters,62,"Finally, albeit in flashes, there are hints that Fifth Harmony may reach that peak."
Uncut,60,"Fifth Harmonys talents do get their shine in spots of this front-loaded hodgepodge."
Boston Globe,60,"The second Fifth Harmony LP isn't a massive step forward, but with a constant bombardment of hooks, high energy and incredible harmony there's not much time to catch your breath to compare."

Entertainment Weekly,83,"While the hooks may not be as irresistible as her 2014 double whammy of Problem and Break Free, Grande compensates by having something meaningful to say with that jaw-dropping voice."
Los Angeles Times,80,"Its not only the consistent songwriting clout that elevates this album from recent efforts by Grandes teen-star peers, Demi Lovato and Selena Gomez. Even if most of it is co-written, the modish message of empowerment feels honest coming from Grande."
AllMusic,80,"While some of these cuts work better than others, the range is impressive, as is Grande's measured, assured performance."
Pitchfork,80,"Held together by Grandes skyscraping voice, Dangerous Woman throws a lot at the wall and, brilliantly, most of it sticks."
Spin,80,"The album glides through styles, maintaining a slightly menacing yet sexed-up vibe throughout."
Rolling Stone,80,"Given that she started out as an actress, it shouldnt come as a surprise that Grande can work convincingly in more than a single mode. But its still impressive how fully she inhabits the emotional environment of each song here, even when one directly contradicts another."
Entertainment Weekly,76,"Even if the results are uneven at times. Grande does not need to force any sort of spirit, she is full of it already. She just needs to find the Dangerous Woman within herself and let her break free."
New Musical Express (NME),75,"Dangerous Woman shouldnt be taken particularly seriously as any kind of maturation, but that it still has some pretty good songs on it. Not counting the bonus tracks, there are only two outright throwaways."
AllMusic,75,"Buoyed by this poise, Dangerous Woman possesses more personality than My Everything. Its also far looser than anything else in Grandes catalog."
The Observer (UK),70,"She appears to be in the right place creatively, but she just needs to take her own advice and break free."
Boston Globe,70,"Though the album immediately shifts gears with the decidedly more contemporary title track, a sultry waltz in which the singer implores her man to test [her] limits, assuring him that, underneath, every 21-century woman is a bad girl, there are smart, unexpected nods to yesteryear throughout the remainder of Dangerous Woman."
Los Angeles Times,60,"These songs [Greedy, Into You and Touch It], which unite a strong persona--haughty, insatiable, a little manic, really into you--with a vivid pocket version of one style or another, are the core of a swift, heedless pop album, albeit one struggling to emerge from the false notes (Dangerous Woman) and rote 2016 obligations (Future) of whats probably an executive-mandated bagginess."
Pitchfork,60,"Grande may not have settled on a sound, but she's still an outsized, dangerous talent."
Pretty Much Amazing,50,"The pop star is putting out fine records, but its hard to escape the feeling that her ludicrous potential remains unfulfilled."

The A.V. Club,80,"Whether in the flesh or behind-the-scenes, each work is all Wainwright. [No. 131, p.61]"
Sputnikmusic,80,"What sounds showy on paper is, in reality, a respectful, atmospheric tribute to the Bard. [Jun 2016, p.82]"
Slant Magazine,80,"All in all, a difficult task accomplished with no shortfall of style and invention."
Spin,80,"Take All My Loves: 9 Shakespeare Sonnets reaffirms that the songwriter/composer is an arranger at home in many styles, with the ability to make this kind of sprawling, genre-surfing project unfold with elegance."
Rolling Stone,80,"This recording is a great addition to his musical catalogue, and a fine way to fall in love with Shakespeare all over again, to boot."
Consequence of Sound,75,"Its hard to imagine how someone whose last album was an opera could out-do themselves, but Rufus Wainwright has achieved just that with Take All My Loves: 9 Shakespeare Sonnets, to be released via Deutsche Gramophon on April 22, 400 years after William Shakespeares death."
Magnet,70,"Wainwright keeps things varied enough to be interesting but concise enough to avoid boredom or overload."
Uncut,70,"The mix of genres and presentation doesnt always segue as well as they might, and strangely given that mix, it could do with being a little more radical at times. That said theres plenty to enjoy and its often fun to hear these iconic works in unfamiliar fashion."
The Independent (UK),60,"It's a grand gesture of a record, though, and if at times it's a little too much, that's entirely in character. [Jun 2016, p.94]"
AllMusic,60,"If this is really where his heart now lies, its hard not to feel a tinge of sadness when you hear his honeyed vocals on A Womans Face, a reworking of a track from 2010 that recalls the swooning, symphonic pop of old."
Exclaim,60,"Save for the playfully tempestuous ThExpense of Spirit in a Waste of Shame (Sonnet 129), theyre serviceable and, like the spoken-word reprises by the likes of William Shatner and Sin Phillips, take few risks."
Consequence of Sound,60,"Even during its more ludicrous moments, though, its impossible to deny the beauty that often shines through."
PopMatters,40,"Take All My Loves is an uneasy marriage of classical and pop, on which the sonnets are often overwhelmed by Wainwrights extravagantly theatrical arrangements."

Drowned In Sound,91,"While hes done nearly a dozen yesteryear-based solo albums, this one is distinguished by its smartly chosen representation of the Gershwins musical breadth and the handpicked, multi-stylistic band (with Mickey Raphaels winsome yet penetrating harmonica again providing a crucial link to Willies larger body of work) fittingly snazzing up the affair while making the most of Willies no-dress-code musical fusion."
Mojo,80,"The swinging, jazz-country arangements are perfect, too, hitching the polished, romantic sophistication of the songs to a down-home, rootsy bonhomie that draws comparison with Dylan's reinterpretations of the Sinatra songbook on 2015's Shadows In the Night. [Apr 2016, p.78]"
The Observer (UK),70,"Yes, his voice is more fragile than it was 38 years ago, the vibrato a less tightly reined. But it remains vivid and well-matched to the material."
Boston Globe,70,"His agreeably slight new release, Summertime, is a songbook album, a stroll through some of George and Ira Gershwins best-loved songs."
musicOMH.com,70,"Gershwin features a number of quirky, intriguing turns from Cyndi Lauper, who on paper couldn't seem further removed from this longtime country outlaw but in execution sounds just right.... Better still are the moments in which Nelson goes it alone, pushing his famed high voice in unexpected directions."
The Guardian,60,"[Willie Nelson] brings feeling and charm to these 11 covers."
Country Weekly,60,"He has an honesty, knows how to caress a good song, and phrases knowingly. [Apr 2016, p.89]"
Uncut,60,"All of Summertime's charm is tied directly to its mellowness. Perhaps it would have been a more interesting record if it had a hint of adventure."
Rolling Stone,40,"Willies battered old voice too often sounds strained and strangled on the higher notes. What should soar barely scrabbles to the right pitch."

The New York Times,80,"There's a '60s simplicity that's instantly engaging. [Feb 2016, p.93]"
Exclaim,80,"A record that exists out of time but feels fresh in how it evokes portions of our collective past."
The Telegraph (UK),80,"Dont slot these guys into an Everly Brothers pigeonhole because not only is no one else releasing music like this, but the refined songwriting and flawless performances push these tunes into near classic territory."
Mojo,80,"At the heart of the mood is something that only comes naturally: the plaintive croon of hand-in-glove brotherly harmonies."
AllMusic,60,"There are a handful of songs here that go a touch beyond just recreating an earlier style, and those are the best ones. If The Cactus Blossoms can expand their ear for detail more consistently into their songwriting and lyrics, they can be flat out great. But they arent quite there yet."

Record Collector,80,"Caroline's 2CD sampler of her moonlighting efforts features charming interludes from past lives. [Nov 2015, p.96]"
Mojo,80,"It's on the 'Disco Queen' side that Thorn's voice really shines through, with both Geist's mix of 'Why Does The Wind' and Escort's extended remix of 'It's All True' being as good as anything Todd Terry did to EBTG back in the 90s."
AllMusic,80,"This new compilation focuses on projects she released under her own name plus sundry collaborations, remixes and assorted feature spots. Above all else, this 34-track assemblage highlights the fact that Thorns trajectory has been an unpredictable and surprising one."
American Songwriter,70,"Thorns ability to craft a full character portrait from just a few lines is starkest on the tracks from her 2010 album, Love and Its Opposite."
Boston Globe,60,"Chronological sequencing would have painted a more coherent picture of how she developed over the decades and although fine in themselves, a bunch of remixes belong to an album of their own. [Jan 2016, p.120]"
PopMatters,60,"Disc 2 is a largely inessential collection of insipid dance remixes and the Massive Attack tracks. Disc 1 is a succinct summation of Thorns doleful, soulful voice and writing career that gives balm and bathos to those on the sidelines that, through their bruisings, let the brasher, flasher and more empty briefly succeed, but through doing so endure and become stronger in themselves."

Uncut,91,"Emotion is so good, its formed sky-high expectations out of thin air."
Mixmag,91,"Her effervescent follow-up [is] an 80s-inflected collection of sweetly breezy dance-pop baubles."
Record Collector,90,"It's so proud to be pop and hopefully this'll make others realise it's never a guilty pleasure to enjoy songs that make you happy; songs that make you wanna dance your ass off and songs that perfectly fit the criteria for pretending to be in a music video."
Boston Globe,85,"Emotion goes to great lengths to prove the advantages of being manufactured, with every piece interlocking with machine-like precision with its surroundings. Its astonishingly effective, and like the best pop, demands to be listened to ad nauseum in order to gawk at the sheer audacity of the accomplishment."
Q Magazine,83,"One of 2015s most interesting, effervescent records."
musicOMH.com,83,"Emotion rolls out banger after banger, all while sustaining a remarkable level of complexity and compassion for everyone in Jepsens solar system."
Pretty Much Amazing,80,"E MO TION is no fluke. It doesnt grip you by the heels but instead lures you into a full-bodied embrace that is iron-clad, its simply up to you to give it the chance to do so."
Entertainment Weekly,80,"Emotion succeeds on its own terms, arguably remaining truer to the spirit of the era, not to mention Jepsens stated aim of taking the time to craft an album rather than rushing to cash in on a YouTube sensation."
Drowned In Sound,80,"An even more consistent album than Kiss, E-MO-TION further defines Jepsen as an equally stylish and earnest pop artist."
Absolute Punk (Staff reviews),80,"An album thats incredibly enjoyable even as Jepsen stands on the precipice of heartache."
The A.V. Club,80,"With an uncanny melodic gift that enlivens even the most tired sentiments and a chameleonic ability to seamlessly transition between disparate production styles, Jepsen proves she's worthy of those comparisons [to Taylor Swift and Rihanna]."
Consequence of Sound,80,"EMOTION demonstrates how little improvement could be made on her sharp, consistent songwriting abilities. These are perfect pop songs; a few more rare glimpses of their rougher edges would make them all the more spectacular."
Sputnikmusic,80,"The result is a nearly anonymous album of stellar pop music, one where it seems all the attention was placed not on positioning Carly Rae as a cultural force, but on making sure Emotion makes you smile."
musicOMH.com,75,"E.MO.TION has all the tenets of a successful pop record, but feels more cultivated than previous work."
AllMusic,74,"EMOTION is as solid and spotless a pop album as you're likely to hear this year, the result of several years working alongside a storied list of contributors.... but EMOTION fails to tell us who Jepsen is or wants to be."
Boston Globe,70,"Emotion is packed with frighteningly relatable songs about love, longing and heartbreak."
Slant Magazine,70,"Almost every track is like a bouncy castle: fun, certainly, but not made for long-term stays."
Exclaim,70,"This is music for flash mobs, a valentine to crowdsourcing, and a public engagement proposal to the universe."
cokemachineglow,60,"For all its unexpected sounds and catchy choruses, Emotion falters in its lyrical blandness."
The Line of Best Fit,60,"Emotion is full of pure cotton candy--delicious, distractingly sweet and filling, with a mildly suspicious aftertaste.... [The album is] full of excellent songs that seem to give up about two-thirds of the way through."
Pitchfork,60,"EMOTION is still a very pleasing album if not just a shade overambitious, clearly trying too hard to make the same genius pop moments that Kiss churned them out with effortless flair."
New Musical Express (NME),60,"Due to the era the album fetishes, the music sounds inescapably chintzy.... Jepsens improbably young voice helps distract from that."
Rolling Stone,40,"Carly Rae Jepsen and her production team try overly hard to be clever. In the end, what's left is a record that takes itself too seriously to be taken seriously by anyone else."

Spin,80,"The results are beautiful."
NOW Magazine,70,"A renegade songwriter with an ultraflexible Great American Songbook sensibility, McKay finds modern resonances everywhere in this inspired covers set."
The New York Times,60,"Where My Weekly Reader shines is on the quieter moments."
PopMatters,50,"Her whip-smart daffiness sets up her serious moments to hit all the harder--but the performances of the (mostly 60s) covers that make up the album are largely uninspired."

New York Daily News (Jim Faber),80,"Transformation is richly and lushly inherent in everything Hegarty makes his own. [No. 116, p.53]"
Under The Radar,80,"Each performance bursts with unadulterated emotionalism as Hegarty's voice swoops and swells around the impeccable-sounding band."
PopMatters,80,"A relatively orthodox live recording. [Dec 2014, p.92]"
Rolling Stone,80,"It's a decent enough introduction to Antony & The Johnson's early works.... Turning bursts into colour on the accompanying DVD. [Dec 2014, p.106]"
AllMusic,80,"The songs sound more muscular than on record, swollen by live strings; Cripple & The Starfish, from his debut, is a standout."
Boston Globe,80,"Though nearly a decade has passed since the performances recorded here, their power is not diminished. If anything, that power resonates more strongly for the strides made by the transgender community during that interim."
Magnet,80,"In short, without seeing Atlas's film, Turning is simply a live recording of Antony and the Johnsons on-stage in London, but thankfully, given their talent and their commitment to their craft, that's more than enough to make this a remarkable experience."
NOW Magazine,75,"Turning gives everyone a chance to be himself or herself-and to be celebrated for it."
Mojo,73,"This is, to date, his quintessential live release, capturing a set that toggles carefully between the bands luxurious sounds and his urgent songs. The Johnsons are in their most measured and exquisite phase, giving new life to cuts familiar from Hegartys catalog.... The accompanying film, however, tries to do too much, in turn missing the simple, genius focus of the conceit."
Q Magazine,70,"It's a giddily emotive affair, primarily slow and sensual. [Jan 2015, p.86]"
Record Collector,70,"Antony commands a stadium with his vocals and tone, or in this case the Barbican in London, while the fragile live air has not failed to be captured in the final product of Turning."
PopMatters,70,"It makes for a decent compilation if youre not already familiar with Hegartys material as it features many of his best tracks, but the long-term fan will struggle to find too much of interest. Yet it makes for an excellent souvenir of a band at the height of their powers."
AllMusic,70,"Here, as always, Hegarty's art gives shape to the deepest loves and darkest sufferings of the human heart."
Under The Radar,70,"The resulting album is a heartfelt set that showcases the 42-year-old singer and pianists elegant style."
Pitchfork,60,"Too often though, and as is almost always the case with live sets, the album is cloistered and airless.... It doesn't so much scourge New York as embody the place it has become. [Nov 2014, p.71]"
Uncut,60,"The songs are largely beautiful, the vocal performance is mostly impeccable and the recording generally captivating, but so was its predecessor.... not quite as good live album."

The Line of Best Fit,80,"With the help of producer Marc Shaiman (Hairspray), Midler is both reverent and mischievous on Its the Girls."
musicOMH.com,80,"Her bubbly first studio album in eight years and one of her best."
Rolling Stone,70,"These are brightly produced songs perfectly suited to Midler's vocal style, stage bravado, and cheeky sense of humor."
New Musical Express (NME),70,"The good news is that Midler has a voice that's rich enough to reanimate any pop standard."
The Wire,60,"For the most part, though, Bette breezes through the 60s."
Clash Music,60,"Even though not everything here quite works, the tracks that do are a great deal of fun and show Midler in fine form."

Boston Globe,80,"While he's lost more of his craft, he's rarely sounded so at ease with himself. [Dec 2014, p.109]"
The New York Times,80,"Co-producers Don Was and Jacknife Lee bring an Orbisonian scale to Melody Road, surrounding him with ornate yet tasteful arrangements worked up by LA's top session cats. [Dec 2014, p.75]"
AllMusic,80,"What makes a difference here is the general lightness of his new songs and Was and Lee's sympathetic production; the two play off each other perfectly, turning this into the first latter-day Diamond record to feel quintessentially Neil Diamond."
Rolling Stone,70,"There are no duds on his first all-new album since 2008--just 12 stripped down soft-rock tracks, not too heavy on the strings, hitting consistently hard whether Diamond plays the winsome crooner ('Something Blue') or the bummed-out belter ('Alone at the Ball')."
Record Collector,63,"Are these new tunes likely to move arena audiences in the same way? Nah. But Diamond sings as though they will. He's still a believer."
PopMatters,60,"It yields mixed results. [Nov 2014, p.100]"
Q Magazine,60,"Its a richly orchestral work, eager for drama and full of appealing tunes."
Uncut,60,"Theres soppy, theres schmaltz, and then theres the latest from Neil Diamond.... Sweep away the saccharine and Diamonds craft as a songwriter still gleams."
AllMusic,60,"The jaunty simplicity of First Time and cod calypso of Sunny Disposition are a tad MOR-by-numbers, perfectly well executed but lacking any real spark. The innate drama in Diamonds powerful and resonant voice is much better served by the more eloquent and layered In Better Days and the Orbisonesque slow burn, Nothing But A Heartache."
Rolling Stone,40,"If this underwritten, over produced debut for Capitol (after being affiliated with Columbia since 1973) is the best he can muster up in six years, its sad to say, its time to consider retirement."

Los Angeles Times,80,"Straight and true, without a trace of rear-view-mirror sentimentality. [Nov 2014, p.92]"
Mojo,70,"Nostalgia is music perfect for enjoying a cup of coffee and an omelet in the morning hours, while slowly waking to the world. Rarely does it command the full attention of the listener and oftentimes it borders on background music, something that Lennox never intended."
New York Daily News (Jim Faber),70,"She and co-producer Mike Stevens keep the production mostly clean and warm, though the song selection is sometimes curious."
The Guardian,70,"Lennox has crafted an album that brings to mind the sophisticated, contemporary sound of her original studio releases while allowing her to revel in the grand popular song tradition."
Record Collector,60,"Lennox is at her best when she sounds most involved, and her beautiful takes on Georgia on My Mind, God Bless the Child and You Belong to Me are full of poignancy and yearning."
American Songwriter,60,"The ex-Eurythmics singer pumps new life in the war horses by locating their bluesy core."
Mojo,60,"'Summertime,' 'Strange Fruit' and 'God Bless the Child' show reverence and impeccable technique yet not quite enough signature to transcend mere impressiveness."
PopMatters,50,"Clearly, these songs are standards for a reason, and Lennox does nothing to tarnish their legacy or expand it."

Boston Globe,83,"The track list is, admittedly, a little dull. Luckily, the singing isn't."
AllMusic,80,"Their respective styles are occasionally at odds, but to amusing effect."
The Guardian,80,"The match between Bennett and Gaga winds up quite differently from the one between the master and k.d. lang in 2002. Those two created a more sober and mature affair. By contrast, the duets with Gaga give Bennett a whole new hold on youth."
New York Daily News (Jim Faber),80,"Its Gaga who will benefit most from this album, which has the pair finding joyous common ground as they swing through 11 standards."
Rolling Stone,60,"Ultimately, Cheek to Cheek is pleasant through and through. Its not the greatest standards duets album ever recorded, but nor is it a dud."
Chicago Tribune,60,"Cheek to Cheek is a record where the music and even the songs take a backseat to the personalities."
Entertainment Weekly,60,"If you take this album in the spirit of throwaway fun in which it seems to have been concocted, it is harmlessly engaging, although all of these tracks have been delivered more persuasively before."
Boston Globe,60,"She sometimes blasts away at these songs rather than relaxing into them. But on challenges like the subtle Billy Strayhorn ballad 'Lush Life,' the queen of the little monsters more than proves she can be a sophisticated lady too."
New York Daily News (Jim Faber),60,"On Cheek to Cheek, Gaga justifies his [Tony Bennett's] faith--sometimes a bit too forcibly. Whereas Bennett is a master of restraint--a guy whose best performances play like melodic chat sessions--Gaga thrives on spectacle."
The Guardian,58,"Their voices complement each other and mesh together almost seamlessly, and on tracks like the big-sounding I Wont Dance, its hard not to smile at the perfectly executed harmony. Covers of slower tunes like Nature Boy dont really offer much thats different or new, but theyre beautiful and engaging nonetheless."
PopMatters,40,"Gaga comes off more as a dilettante than an aficionado on Cheek to Cheek.... Bennett doesn't fare a whole lot better, his otherwise charming performances strained throughout. The pair's solo efforts, particularly Gaga's clumsy interpretation of Billy Strayhorn's 'Lush Life' and Bennett's surprisingly pitchy rendition of Duke Ellington's 'Sophisticated Lady,' only serve to spotlight their shortcomings."
AllMusic,25,"Shallow, deeply unimaginative renditions [of standards out of the Great American Songbook]."

The Telegraph (UK),70,"Ultimately, Partners works as guided tour down Streisand's memory lane, and with her resonant voice still in supple shape, any excuse to hear her sing is a welcome invitation."
Rolling Stone,60,"Throughout, Streisands voice sound more robust than it has for some time, especially compared to her live performance last year in Brooklyn. But she has a tendency to oversing in an attempt to engage with her guests."
Billboard.com,50,"Most of the dozen tracks on Partners-- which features duet partners such as Michael Bubl, Andrea Bocelli and the singers son, Jason Gould--offer no such vantage [of a whole other way of looking at [a] song].... Yet there is strong work here--four songs that live up to the singer's stated ambition."
Consequence of Sound,40,"The choppy calls and responses between Ms. Streisand and her partners, however, lack conversational or narrative flow, and you have an uncomfortable sense that the parts were spliced together after the fact."
Slant Magazine,40,"This record falls into all the icky, celebrity duet traps."

Los Angeles Times,80,"L'Aventura could well be his best album. [Sep 2014, p.78]"
AllMusic,80,"Here he delivers a 14-minute psychedelic disco odyssey ('Comment Revoir Oursinet?') about missing his teddy bear. The rest of 'L'Aventura', his sixth album, is deep-pile funk ('Sous Les Rayons Du Soleil'), bouncing electro-soul ('Aller Vers Le Soleil') and as cheesy as a Camembert cravat."
New York Daily News (Jim Faber),80,"Though his aims of presenting this as a robust, high-concept album arent necessarily met, this is still wonderful pop."
Los Angeles Times,80,"While it may not be as charmingly nave as he claims, LAventura is an unexpected transformation of the classic Tellier formula: pure electro-madness and bearded sex-appeal."
The New York Times,74,"With LAventura, hes done a fine job of sticking the landing."
The Telegraph (UK),70,"As always, L'Aventura is rife with touches that knowledgeable listeners will appreciate, but anyone with a fondness for smoothly retro mood music with lots of personality will find a lot to enjoy."
Uncut,60,"Yes, it's hugely self-indulgent at times, but in the best way, whereby the listener is gently invited along for the ride, rather than dragged kicking and screaming."
New Musical Express (NME),60,"Most compelling on the looser, less slick numbers. [Aug 2014, p.96]"
musicOMH.com,60,"It all has an airy charm, though it benefits hugely from a Daft Punk-y electro injection on Rick l'Adolescent and Aller vers le Soleil, both which transcend cheerful pastiche. But Tellier's opulence has limits. [Aug 2014, p.114]"
The Line of Best Fit,30,"Sbastien Tellier has a tendency to tackle substantial topics, and it often smacks of dilettantism."

Pitchfork,78,"With some hits and misses, A.K.A. journeys through some predictable refrains with a handful of prospective triumphs."
AllMusic,60,"When the scale tips too heavily toward rhythm--as it does on 'Booty' and 'I Luh Ya Papi'--the productions don't do Lopez many favors, burying her in their thrum."
The Guardian,60,"The album features more guest rappers than even her 2002 remix album, and the standout 'Acting Like That,' featuring the always reliable Iggy Azalea, is handily the hardest beat she's ever bought. Unfortunately, A.K.A. also includes a slew of midtempo ballads whose soaring hooks and slick production are wasted on Lopez's reedy voice."
Mojo,50,"Much of A.K.A. is still mawkish, midtempo melodrama that does too much to accentuate J. Lo's tunelessness."
Q Magazine,50,"There is one half of a solid album in A.K.A., Jennifer Lopezs first new release in three years."
Drowned In Sound,40,"A.K.A. finds J.Lo throwing anything she can at the wall to see what sticks."
Billboard.com,40,"Beyond summer-anthem contender 'I Luh Ya Papi,' Lopez supplements flat production from names like RoccStar with forgettable verses from rappers like T.I."
AllMusic,40,"Anybody who heard 2011's Love? won't find much new here, forgettable EDM-by-numbers floor-fillers jostling with marginally more inspired ballads."
Slant Magazine,30,"A poor album due to poor production and song writing, poor sales and poor vocal delivery."
Spin,25,"The songwriting is lazy ('I feel good,' she coos, ''cause I don't feel bad.' Logic!). The double entendres don't make sense (is 'Troubeaux' what they call trouble in Bordeaux?). And the guest stars, including Nas, Rick Ross, and Iggy Azalea, are so much more engaging than their hostess that Lopez sounds like she's been relegated to playing the hook girl on her own album."

Boston Globe,80,"The overall effect is both dark and playful. [May 2014, p.74]"
New York Daily News (Jim Faber),80,"In many respects, Greens music feels like it belongs to an era much earlier than the 21st century. Yet in a modern industry that can often seem to be dominated by formulaic performers, Liz Green remains highly relevant as that rare exception. A true original."
Rolling Stone,60,"Distinct high and lows are lacking, the songs blurring like a long night, but Green remains a mistress of her mood. [May 2014, p.110]"
The Observer (UK),60,"There is much to like about Green's music, but if Haul Away! is indeed part of a potential trilogy, let's hope the songwriting on her third offering outweighs its stylish ambitions."
PopMatters,60,"At times her deliberate vocal style disconnects the listener, and one hopes as Greens career progresses, she trades in the allegories for something a bit more emotionally inclusive."
Entertainment Weekly,40,"It's all a bit similar, and amazingly unmoving, until the last number. [May 2014, p.92]"

Uncut,80,"An unadventurous set list reworks some of his most thoughtful and sombre songs with a selection of classic covers, all given a lush production gloss by the late Phil Ramone. What lifts it to a higher plane is Michaels smooth and expressive singing."
musicOMH.com,60,"Symphonica certainly offers a heady, luxurious soire, proving genuinely moving in parts, but its also quite exhausting and yes, occasionally bewildering."
Q Magazine,60,"Michael is in good form but he's coasting, doing no more than he needs to, satisfying fans without surprising."
AllMusic,60,"Symphonica is decidedly upmarket, but more picks in keeping with its ballsy take on the Newley & Bricusse standard Feeling Good wouldn't have hurt. [Apr 2014, p.90]"
Clash Music,60,"Competently organised and confidently delivered, its an engaging set, but ultimately, like all live albums, essentially a souvenir."
Mojo,60,"A swank live set of classic makeout ballads."
The Telegraph (UK),60,"Symphonica feels supper-club safe. [Apr 2014, p.103]"
PopMatters,60,"To be fair, he can croon the stuffing out of the most well-worn covers (Brother Can You Spare a Dime is a searingly emotional trip through several octaves), but it's at the expense of spontaneity."
AllMusic,60,"Mainly for completists, then, but they'll feel lavishly rewarded."
Mojo,50,"An ultra-gentrified karaoke set. [Apr 2014, p.77]"
The Independent (UK),40,"Theres no getting around the fact that his versions of Feeling Good or The First Time Ever I Saw Your Face pale compared to those of Nina Simone and Roberta Flack."

Rolling Stone,88,"Cooders production is fittingly raw, putting no phony gloss on these songs brimming with heart-on-sleeve honesty."
Q Magazine,80,"The albums center of gravity, always, is the Hadens vocal blend, which isnt seamless or airless but rather a series of alert, intuitive micro-negotiations in the realm of intonation and timbre. At times you notice how much is actually happening, moment to moment, in that blend."
The Guardian,80,"It's the Haden Triplets and their untouched yet effortless harmonies, the kind that can only be derived via the preternatural harmonic instinct shared by siblings, that provide all of the chills (the good, non-flu kind)."
The Observer (UK),70,"Each note has a purpose, and every musician playing or singing is doing a magnificent job bringing it to life."
Uncut,67,"After a while this velvet-lined blast from the past gets a little dry, but the Hadens bring a new audience to these cultural touchstones."
New York Daily News (Jim Faber),50,"Overall the Haden Triplets dont bring enough of anything special to these songs to make the album an overall success."

Los Angeles Times,60,"Of seven swing covers and duets, only the high camp title track with Rufus Wainwright sparkles. [Dec 2013, p.92]"
The New York Times,60,"It's the original tracks that bring a new life to the form, while the standards--routine duets of 'I Wanna Be Like You' and 'Dream a Little Dream' with Olly Murs and Lily Allen, and a bland 'Puttin' on the Ritz'-- sound like filler."
AllMusic,60,"Those who endured Williamss recent X Factor performance need not fear: this brassy sequel to 2001s big-band LP Swing When Youre Winning, is actually rather listenable."
Paste Magazine,60,"Its not an unqualified success, but its a guaranteed seller over Christmas. And, as one of this countrys more entertaining pop stars, its nice to have him back."
Austin Chronicle,60,"Some of the covers are too well-worn (Minnie the Moocher and Puttin' On the Ritz), but Snowblind's admission of vulnerability is rather moving."
American Songwriter,40,"There's an innate problem in the way Swings Both Ways swings--like a pendulum, flipping and flopping between 2013 and 1953, a problem that the orchestra can't resolve."
Mojo,40,"Williams is at his best when hes being weird, so cheeky title track Swings Both Ways, which finds him examining his fluid sexuality with Rufus Wainwright, is good. But any fresh moments are balanced by too many unlistenable ones."

The Independent (UK),70,"On this album shes singing with more rhythm, if not more clarity, than usual."
The Independent on Sunday (UK),70,"There's nothing here that screams big hit-but it's something better: the work of a diva who is comfortable in her own skin."
musicOMH.com,60,"The finished product is almost a reinvention."
The Guardian,60,"Dion's cover of Janis Ian's rueful 'At Seventeen' comes off less like a lament for childhood dreams that didn't come to pass and more like a lilting word of advice from someone old enough to know better, which is precisely the zone where the album excels: when Dion drops the act and embraces her manic, Hallmark card-brandishing guru of schmaltz."
The Observer (UK),50,"She experiments at times with a more gravelly voice, suggesting a bid for more street appeal, but the overall effect is stiff and mechanical, minus the warmth for which she is known."


NOW Magazine,80,"The album closes masterfully with Time to Go, a look at an older musician and the indignities hes facing as an opening act far from his peak. It is one of several tracks making this an album that every Harry Connick Jr. fan should own."
The New York Times,60,"Ultimately, Every Man Should Know is a record with something for every Connick fan."
AllMusic,60,"Connick displays his versatility with the bossa nova sway of I Love Her, the New Orleans R&B of S'pposed To Be and You've Got It, and the sentimental country stylings of Greatest Love Story."
The Guardian,37,"Connick's music has none of the attitude the singer often summons outside the studio."

Slant Magazine,80,"Although Cullum got his start during the jazz singer boom of the early 2000s, with Momentum he's proven once again to be a musically eclectic songwriter with more than enough creative speed to keep him going for years to come."
Boston Globe,60,"He's employed iPhone apps, junk-shop keyboards, cassette recorders and other unlikely paraphernalia to illustrate the wider aural picture. [Jun 2013, p.86]"
Entertainment Weekly,60,"On the whole, Momentum is a solid slice of radio friendly pop-rock, and sadly, its truly deserving of that particular set of epithets."
Billboard.com,60,"It certainly goes beyond his retro-jazz comfort zone, with piercing electric organ and electric piano lending a vibrant, visceral edge to several songs."

PopMatters,90,"One of the best releases of 2013, so far."
The New York Times,80,"An album thats simultaneously playful, down-home, innovative and devotional."
AllMusic,80,"On spirityouall, McFerrin does what he has always done as an artist -- he makes this troubled world shine bright as a diamond."
Los Angeles Times,80,"It manages to preserve the defiance, drama, faith and heart of the original gospel classics, while making them sound like contemporary music."
Absolute Punk (Staff reviews),60,"Theres a personal context (Macs dad was a famous singer of spirituals), the band is great, the vibe folksy."

cokemachineglow,100,"Tom Jones is almost 73 years old, is singing as well as he ever has while refusing to conform to his stereotypes, is artistically and perhaps spiritually searching and restless, and is recording perhaps the finest music of his long career."
Pitchfork,80,"If it cant quite pack the same surprise blindsiding punch of Praise & Blame, its now crystal clear that Sir Tom is, almost fifty years along, recording the strongest albums of his career."
Boston Globe,80,"The grain and gravitas of Jones's voice is perfectly suited to this diverse material. [Jun 2012, p.82]"
AllMusic,80,"Thankfully, he's well advised: the material is carefully chosen to exploit his abilities."
The Independent (UK),70,"It may be time to tinker next time around, but right now he's redeemed an awful lot of himself."
Los Angeles Times,70,"While Spirit in the Room matches its predecessor on a track-by-track level, it's only in those last moments that the whole package seems as thematically sound and well designed."
AllMusic,70,"With this album and its predecessor, he has achieved a genuine gravitas and, more importantly, a believable honesty."
Mojo,70,"It doesn't always work, but when it does, it suggests a great artist finding new and surer ground. [Jun 2012, p.77]"
musicOMH.com,70,"Cashback? Pretty close."
The Independent (UK),60,"He thrives when bringing gravitas to the sparse blues of Soul Of a Man and extraordinary tenderness to the Low Anthem Charlie Darwin. [Jun 2012, p.105]"
PopMatters,60,"Like the late Johnny Cash, Jones has reinterpreted the venerable songs in a bare, bluesy style. Unlike Cash, he never quite makes them his own."
The New York Times,60,"The album has to be judged a late-period triumph, even if I am not entirely convinced The Voice's avuncular judge is quite as deep as the material demands."
AllMusic,60,"It's never as rollicking as 2010's Praise and Blame, though a version of Tom Waits' Bad As Me will sound agreeably demented to anyone who's never heard the original."
The Guardian,60,"Ultimately, you conclude, Jones's golden voice was built for hooting, hollering and hubba-hubba-ing at the ladies, not mulling things over."
The Independent on Sunday (UK),50,"Covers of Leonard Cohen and Tom Waits are good fits; elsewhere, his off the leash vibrato oversells."

Blurt Magazine,80,"This singer knows what suits his voice, an undeniably rich and powerful instrument, and uses it without showing off."
PopMatters,80,"The singing is warm and temperate, emotionally expressive without any sign of strain. But theres an intriguing tension in some of the other material."
Mojo,80,"While all of Groban's albums are immaculately produced affairs, All That Echoes is one of his best."
The Independent (UK),80,"All That Echoes is not only Grobans most accessible and unified work to date, but it also stands out as the seminal musical moment of his 12-year career."
BBC Music,50,"The album continues in the vein of longtime Groban producer David Fosters Olympic-ceremony pop: panoramic in scope, the better for Grobans clear, tremulous tenor to stand on mountains and call out vague blandishments."
AllMusic,40,"For all his personable self-deprecation, the blend of operatic pop on which his reputation is built seems strangely thin and insipid."

musicOMH.com,80,"The arrangements are ingenious, emphasizing Ms. Haden's gift for mimesis: she can suggest the swoon of a string section as handily as the blare of a solitary bugle."
Uncut,75,"Goes To The Movies is an a capella tour de force. [Jan-Feb 2013, p.87]"
New Musical Express (NME),70,"The effect [sung wordlessly, a cappella, with a multi-tracked choir humming the arrangements] is initially comic but soon becomes utterly mesmeric. [Mar 2013, p.72]"
Q Magazine,70,"It's another impressive album that shows Haden to be a truly talented singer and vocal arranger, and one that fans of movie music done in a non-traditional fashion should find quite interesting."
The Independent on Sunday (UK),69,"For the most part, she chooses her films wisely, picking songs that not only give her a lot to do vocally but also create sonic rhymes across the album.... Compositions with lyrics give her a bit more trouble."
The Telegraph (UK),60,"Truly cinematic and imbued with humour and pathos, popcorn not included. [Apr 2013, p.94]"
The Guardian,60,"As with all impressive novelty albums, it's hard to imagine getting to a sixth play of these nonetheless flawless interpretations, and even those would mostly be for friends and neighbors. [No. 95, p.54]"
The Observer (UK),60,"Petra Goes to the Movies is creative, weird, often wonderful, sometimes irritating, and certainly the work of a terrific and inventive musician."

Rolling Stone,91,"'Home' and 'How Are Things in Glocca Morra?' will thrill fans of The Broadway Album, and 'I Think It's Going to Rain Today' is flawless."
BBC Music,90,"It's hard to complain when the results are this stunning."
The New York Times,80,"What is evident is the astonishing consistency of Streisand's tone, her sometimes goose-bump-inducing interpretative gifts, and her stunning power over 45 years."
AllMusic,60,"Essential for fans, of course. It is left to the rest of us to look on from a safe distance with our hard hats on and to marvel at the most self-regarding singing voice in post-war popular music."
American Songwriter,50,"Streisand's style has its downside. Listening to her sing can be like watching a home run derby--an impressive display of physical prowess, but nothing's at stake."

Boston Globe,83,"[Glad Rag Doll] brings out the warmth in a voice that's been chilly, verging on aloof, at times. She calls this her 'song and dance record'; I'd call it her nimble, witty, change-of-pace record."
The Independent (UK),83,"[A] nimble, witty, change-of-pace record."
The New York Times,80,"Glad Rag Doll breaks intriguing new ground for a hitherto smooth operator. [Nov 2012, p.90]"
Under The Radar,80,"T-Bone Burnett renders mostly old jazz numbers with a blend of period feel and modern fidelity, so they're 'in the tradition' without sounding antique."
Uncut,80,"Krall's smoky contralto lacks the pungency of Wilson's, but compensates with greater mobility."
AllMusic,80,"What's old is new again, and in this case Diana Krall finds something new in older music--a rejuvenation earned by looking backward in years but forward in daring."
Paste Magazine,80,"The results are lively and irreverent. [Nov 2012, p.77]"
Mojo,80,"Krall never seems out of place even as she takes chances in a space that could have left her sounding overwhelmed."
Magnet,70,"The warmth, sophistication, humor, and immediacy present on this set make it a welcome addition to her catalog."
PopMatters,60,"Some tracks still sound ripe for Christmas rom-coms. But the best see veteran producer T-Bone Burnett, Tom Wait's guitarist Marc Ribot and Krall's husband Elvis Costello rough up her seductive keys with some electric Americana fuzz. [Nov 2012, p.99]"
Entertainment Weekly,60,"'Wide River to Cross,' by Buddy and Julie Miller is a contemporary outlier on an album crowded with relics, and its beautiful realization invites the question of what other sort of album Ms. Krall and Mr. Burnett might have made without any point to prove."
AllMusic,50,"Burnett is generally unable to deliver the magic he brought to Alison Krauss, among others."

Boston Globe,80,"Elling's individualist vocal reinterpretations are well worth hearing."
The Independent on Sunday (UK),80,"Only Pleasant Valley jars--the irony in Elling's voice is ladled on too heavily--but elsewhere marvel at a master at work. [Nov 2012, p.86]"
PopMatters,80,"Elling brings an enraptured frankness to You Send Me, and sings I Only Have Eyes for You in a kind of stunned daze."
Expert Witness (MSN Music),70,"What works best here works gorgeously."
Entertainment Weekly,70,"Ultimately, though, it is just this diverse stylistic quality, both in the source material and Elling's arrangements, that make The Brill Building Project one of his most interesting albums."
Mojo,70,"On whole, 1619 Broadway is a mixed bag. The weak links, for me, are the least interesting things that Elling has recorded. But the highlights are transcendent. Good enough to make this recording essential in many ways."
The Independent (UK),50,"The big Brill concept doesn't work, Cahn, Cooke and Ellington not being song-factory writers."

The Independent on Sunday (UK),88,"Ever confident of her allure both as a woman and an artist, Furtado on The Spirit Indestructible proves nearly untouchable."
PopMatters,70,"Furtado isn't entirely successful; at times, the album is more impressive for what she intends to achieve than what she accomplishes. And yet for all its contradictions and clumsiness, it's hard not to admire The Spirit Indestructible, for it is that rare thing: a major-label album that bears the unmistakably messy, human stamp of an artist."
Uncut,70,"Yet for all its contradictions and clumsiness, it's hard not to admire The Spirit Indestructible, for it is that rare thing: a major-label album that bears the unmistakably messy, human stamp of an artist."
American Songwriter,70,"Whether her strategy is to sing-song her way beyond the abrasive edges or to conversely turn her voice into an even more abrasive element, Furtado makes it all work."
AllMusic,60,"There's a fair bit of 'positivity' gloop, such as Believers (Arab Spring), but not enough to ruin a decent album."
Q Magazine,42,"A wasteland of electro-funk also-rans and half-baked nods to hip-hop. [14/21 Sep 2012, p.141]"
The New York Times,40,"Time for another rethink. [Nov 2012, p.96]"
Boston Globe,40,"It's not all bad, of course-if you prefer your sugar with a side of C-rate bounce, there are things here with which you most certainly could spend your Saturday nights."
BBC Music,40,"Main producer Rodney Jerkins keeps the beats tight and hooks polished, but Furtado's flaming identity crisis makes this cringe listening."

Mojo,75,"The rather unimaginative song selection is enlivened by inventive medleys, stylistic reinterpretations, and playfully arranged instrumentals. [No.89 p.55]"
The Guardian,70,"[An] elaborate, sophisticated collection. [Sep 2012, p.79]"
The New York Times,70,"Jackson's love for Ellington but unwillingness to play it safe puts The Duke much closer in spirit to its inspiration than rote copies of originals would ever have done."
AllMusic,60,"[Many of] these clean-sounding, jazz-rock rearrangements of songs from 1928 to 1963 prove successful experiments. [Aug 2012, p.100]"
PopMatters,60,"He wins you over, eventually."
The Independent (UK),60,"For the most part his tribute to Duke Ellington works in the way that should keep purist onside. [Aug 2012, p.96]"
Los Angeles Times,60,"Even when it's too adult-contempo (see Steve Vai grating new age cheese all over 'Isfahan') this album always has one thing going for it  it makes you want to listen to some Duke Ellington."
AllMusic,50,"Most of the time, Jackson's new arrangements of Ellington's compositions don't serve the songs so much as they betray the arrogance of a musician who wants to show us how he can bring this music into the present day while ignoring many of the qualities that made it timeless."
AllMusic,40,"The Duke is too scattershot, and Jackson doesn't quite know what genre to focus on."
Slant Magazine,20,"The Duke is an awful, awful record."

The Guardian,88,"It might be the year's most beautifully sung recording."
Entertainment Weekly,83,"It's a prime showcase for his new voice and burgeoning mettle, proving that Bieber isn't just maturing, he's evolving."
Q Magazine,80,"The beats here are deft as well as driving. Surprisingly, EDM stylings such as the juddering bassline of As Long As You Love Me work well with his plaintive and still unmistakeably teenage voice."
PopMatters,80,"Believe has enough strong material to keep most of the followers satisfied for another year, while elders should feel relieved that nothing is as sickly sweet as 'Baby.'"
Rolling Stone,80,"Justin Bieber's new album not only finds him becoming an artist for adults on his own terms, but showcasing impressively distinctive tones and translating an innate charisma across many styles."
Magnet,74,"Overall, Believe sinks its tendrils into the listener's brain by riding the dance music phenomenon and offering some whizz-bang production alongside Bieber's sticky-sweet singing voice."
Uncut,70,"Believe doesn't always live up to the standards of its best cuts."
Blurt Magazine,67,"Believe is most appealing when Bieber either emulates his mentor Usher-on dance-R&B tracks like 'Boyfriend' (which remains one of 2012's best pop singles) or the slinky deluxe-edition track 'Out Of Town Girl'-or plays to his basest, and best, pop instincts, like the aforementioned Jackson-aping 'Die In Your Arms' or the Diplo-assisted head-rush 'Thought Of You.'"
Q Magazine,60,"A mostly harmless exercise in selling records."
The Independent on Sunday (UK),60,"The more aggressive bangers are effective, though Bieber gets eclipsed by everything else going on in the tracks."
Mojo,60,"His gently sparkling persona can get overwhelmed by all the sonic gear-switching, technological tomfoolery and sweaty come-ons; it can all feel a bit rushed."
Rolling Stone,50,"Though his new voice has the rambunctiousness that pubescence assumes, it's also marked with the timorousness that's less often celebrated, but equally omnipresent among vocalists trying to figure out the limits of their new range."
AllMusic,40,"Lyrical awkwardness abounds."
Consequence of Sound,40,"The blandness of the R&B pop-soul arrangements simply throws attention on to the repetitive narrowness of Bieber's delivery."

Boston Globe,80,"It could all be so much MOR easy-on-the-earwash but Gardot's silken voice, musicality and knack for a telling lyric exude class. [Jun 2012, p.92]"
Los Angeles Times,80,"[A] spellbinding third studio album."
Entertainment Weekly,80,"When you rouse yourself from Gardot's dream, it can be hard to recall any individual song, but the reverie is beautiful."
The Observer (UK),70,"The Absence isn't just an experiment in various styles. The songs are terrific. too. [Jul 2012, p.73]"
AllMusic,70,"The album is a lush, somewhat orchestral album that finds Gardot delving into various Brazilian, Spanish, and African-influenced sounds -- including bits of samba, tango, bossa nova, and calypso -- that evince her global journey."
BBC Music,60,"It never really breaks free, but The Absence is, in its best bits, an album of real beauty and elegance, and should cause hearts to grow fond of her."

Billboard.com,80,"The arrangements are sharp and witty, the singing deceptively easygoing, and the guitar playing just terrific."
Fact Magazine (UK),70,"Shockingly, it all works--quite well. If you like Pizzarelli, you'll enjoy this immensely. If, however, you find his voice too thin and nasally, then Double Exposure won't win you over."
The A.V. Club,70,"What's charming about this album, beyond the sheer quality of the songs and the arrangements, is Pizzarelli's obvious and genuine love for this really broad gamut of material, and his insight into the varied qualities that make them all great songs."
musicOMH.com,70,"The good stuff, whenever it was first made, is just good. And there's no reason not to have fun with it. John Pizzarelli is good at the fun stuff, again."

NOW Magazine,81,"Between the obvious hits and the Halcion fuzz however lays an interesting sound."
Rolling Stone,80,"This Norah Jones is damaged, dangerous and vulnerable, and Burton's mastery of sound helps deepen the relationship between listener and song."
Slant Magazine,80,"Little Broken Hearts is exciting because it explores the darkest corners of betrayal, bad love, and jealousy with enough vitality to propel Jones out of the bloodless purgatory of brunch music."
Boston Globe,80,"There is a lot at play here, both sonically and lyrically, and the album rewards repeated listens. Most importantly, Little Broken Hearts is an album that just works."
The Independent (UK),80,"This is a striking changeup."
Mojo,80,"There's always an ingenious, often unexpected, connection linking the music to the mood of a specific song."
The New York Times,80,"In the past decade, it seems Jones has made a sneaky transition from dinner party backdrop to David Lynch soundtrack."
The Telegraph (UK),80,"She hasn't sounded quite so free and engaged as she does on these songs, where her vocal and lyrical mannerisms come through more forcefully and confidently."
Uncut,78,"Jones takes a gothic turn with 'Miriam,' a soaring, surreal account of a romantic rival's murder. Like so much of ... Little Broken Hearts, it kills."
AllMusic,75,"Not everything works. The closing 'All a Dream' is a six-minute drag back to sleepy-time Norah. But mostly, Jones plays her part in this career left-turn with chilled and sometimes chilling resolve."
musicOMH.com,75,"With Brian Burton (a.k.a. Danger Mouse) producing, the heavy-lidded-vixen thing works for her here."
The Observer (UK),74,"With Jones these days, you may not know exactly what you're getting, but you know it's going to be great."
Boston Globe,70,"By placing so much emphasis on the stylish ever-shifting surfaces of its production, Little Broken Hearts never quite sinks in emotionally. Norah Jones may be pouring her heart out but it's been given an elegantly detailed sculpture that camouflages her pain."
AllMusic,70,"The entire album plays like a cohesive whole, somehow frayed and fragmented if not left intact."
PopMatters,70,"Her fifth album is a brand-rejigging songwriting collab with Brian 'Danger Mouse' Burton that both picks up her pace and pumps up her palette."
Okayplayer,70,"By revealing some carefully chosen, deeply personal details and by building elaborate faades for the sake of drama, Jones has crafted her headiest, most complex album to date."
Exclaim,70,"This is a serious indie pop album. Jones and Burton have created something that should fit in the record collection of any Feist-loving indie kid just as easily as that of those soccer moms she won over years ago."
Spin,70,"This is a bold and engaging revolution. [May 2012, p.75]"
musicOMH.com,70,"She keeps the mood fairly moderate amongst Burton's fluid soundtrack, setting the pace with a wry bravado that makes this album a dynamic listen."
Boston Globe,60,"Little Broken Hearts is held back by a lack of intimacy and the unemotional stiffness we associate with Jones. Still, it's almost a great album."
The Independent (UK),60,"Little Broken Hearts finds an effective way to grab the listener by the lapels: with kid gloves."
The Telegraph (UK),60,"Mostly, though, Little Broken Hearts finds an effective way to grab the listener by the lapels: with kid gloves."
American Songwriter,60,"It's exquisite, of course, but dull."
Austin Chronicle,60,"An intriguing partnership that fails to entirely live up to expectations. [May 2012, p.86]"
Chicago Tribune,58,"Jones is good at what she does, but it never feels like something she burns to do."
Entertainment Weekly,40,"Danger Mouse's presence-and underperformance-on Little Broken Hearts turns what might otherwise just be another safe but bullshit-free Norah Jones album into an especially underwhelming affair."
Filter,20,"It's one boringly pedestrian plod after another. [Jun 2012, p.104]"

AllMusic,100,"It's full of breathtakingly beautiful harmonies and spiralling narrative lyrics that balance complex emotional subject matter with pitch-perfect delivery and hummable melodies"
PopMatters,91,"If Out of the Game sounds old-fashioned, Wainwright's words feel like postcards from now."
Rolling Stone,90,"On Out of the Game, Wainwright does not disappoint: whirling string sections and a chorus of women exhale grief behind the brash songwriter who knows no shade of blue that eludes him."
Slant Magazine,88,"This ability to maneuver through complex emotions is one of Wainwright's strengths and makes 'Out of the Game' an essential recording."
Consequence of Sound,88,"Out of the Game is melodically smart and consistently rewarding."
Uncut,83,"Out Of The Game is one of the latter, joining Poses and Release The Stars as the Wainwright album most likely to disarm listeners less inclined to appreciate his occasional forays into the operatic, theatrical, or maudlin."
BBC Music,80,"Not every moment is seamless, but the results are fascinating and, more importantly, enthralling from beginning to end."
NOW Magazine,80,"This album is one of his most classicist, not classical, pop records and in that sense, Out of the Game is definitely a winner."
The Guardian,80,"He's got it all here: fun pop trifles, moody love songs, masterful opuses of mourning and love."
The Observer (UK),80,"Masterful... this new album marks a return to the pop chops and killer hooks that initially made Wainwright so celebrated."
The Independent on Sunday (UK),80,"It's his best since 2003's ornate Want One."
Mojo,80,"At 38, Rufus's star moment appears to have finally arrived. [May 2012, p.108]"
The A.V. Club,80,"A surprisingly effective 21st century take on the Seventies singer-songwriter album, with tight band performances from the likes of the Dap-Kings and sympathetic production from the king of the trumpets."
Under The Radar,80,"This is jouncey, mostly R&B-derived pop with a keen ear for what supports a melody. It's good."
Q Magazine,80,"Rufus reins in his extravagant tendencies for a subtly shaded, seductive album that radiates warmth and contentment. [May 2012, p.84]"
NOW Magazine,80,"Ronson and Wainwright have dressed these songs to kill, not just to impress. [May 2012, p.84]"
Entertainment Weekly,80,"It seems churlish to complain about songwriting and production as madly ambitious as this  filled with nuance and detail, sweeping and dizzy in its self-absorption, it builds at moments to an operatic grandeur."
Paste Magazine,80,"The tracks where he and Ronson contribute equally can be stunning. Rashida, for one, is a gem, in which Ronson's Dap-Kings horn section finds perfect, sleazy symmetry with Wainwright's louche vocal."
Los Angeles Times,80,"Wainwright and Ronson come together with a well-mannered tightness and proficiency that, at best, astounds."
The Boston Phoenix,70,"Thanks in part to retro-modern producer Mark Ronson, it never feels too arch."
The A.V. Club,70,"Out of the Game is very much a master class in restraint. Rather than straining for the big choruses, here Wainwright intones over smooth backings, horns and the gospel harmonies of Brooklyn soul-stirrers The Dap-Kings."
Exclaim,68,"When Wainwright falters, it's for familiar reasons, usually some combination of overindulging and oversharing."
AllMusic,67,"Mark Ronson's production keeps the theatricality tight, surfacing in the skittered beats of 'Perfect Man,' but Out of the Game presents Wainwright shedding some of the foolishness of youth, even if somewhat reluctantly."
Consequence of Sound,65,"Wainwright shows that his pop legs, while shaky, haven't lost their footing. [No.87 p.60]"
Boston Globe,60,"Out Of The Game is a pretty mellow affair, and although it's hard not to miss Wainwright's 'ponderous, pseudo-genius' extravagance, one can't help but be charmed by how lucid and relaxed he sounds. [Jun 2012, p.156]"
PopMatters,60,"The results are undeniably classy."
Q Magazine,60,"It's audaciously hit and miss, inevitably, but 'Out Of The Game' is anything but shy and retiring."
Clash Music,60,"Rufus Wainwright believes this to be 'the most pop album' he's ever made, and he's probably right, so long as you're thinking 1970s pop."
The Independent on Sunday (UK),60,"A record that leaves no seam un-burst in its insatiable quest for mainstream adoration and success."
Uncut,50,"What really makes this album the disappointment that it is is not the songs that wallow in the background. It's relistening to his earlier work that puts it into perspective."
Mojo,30,"His most ridiculous and worst album to date."

The Telegraph (UK),100,"It's de-lovely."
The Guardian,80,"Kisses on the Bottom is a winner from beginning to end."
musicOMH.com,80,"The music ... floats over you like a light mist on a cool spring morning in an English garden as the sun glints through the haze."
Rolling Stone,80,"It sounds like a romantic gift to his new wife and a sentimental salute to his own childhood--a minor gem from a major talent."
BBC Music,80,"This album is made with care, love and expertise and it shows on every song. [Mar 2012, p.80]"
Pitchfork,80,"Remind[s] you just what a good singer the rocking knight can be. And after years of personal and professional earnestness, he sounds like he's having fun."
Austin Chronicle,80,"It's beautifully done, with palpable affection for the songs, airy whimsy and perhaps a hint of mischief."
Magnet,70,"Throughout the tunes, you can hear that McCartney loves the language of the old songs. He enjoys the phraseology, tickles and teases each lyrical phrase. You can hear that he's waited forever to do as much such as this."
Under The Radar,60,"The album works because McCartney treats the material with respect, exuding charm by the bucket-load. [Mar 2012, p.94]"
The Observer (UK),60,"It's got a sweet, easy intimacy."
The Fly (UK),60,"It's warmly, immaculately recorded, featuring a wealth of tasty cocktail pop atmosphere perfect for sipping wine on the couch late at night or reclining with a book in a bay window on a lazy Sunday afternoon. It's fine, it's dandy, and it's completely inessential."
The Independent (UK),60,"Kisses on the Bottom is a respectable collection from a pop mastermind."
Drowned In Sound,60,"The album is inconsequential."
No Ripcord,60,"As a vocalist, this may not be his natural forte, but he takes great care with the songs, and that palpable love is enough to make Kisses on the Bottom worth a spin or two."
PopMatters,60,"Kisses on the Bottom may only get you about halfway there, flowers in hand wondering whether a second date is on the cards, unsure if that's even what you want at all."
Entertainment Weekly,60,"McCartney is better transforming influences than mirroring them."
Paste Magazine,58,"Here they sound like preludes to a nice cup of tea and an afternoon nap."
The New York Times,50,"These songs are meant to swing, but McCartney lets them plod."
The Telegraph (UK),50,"Such relaxed saunters down musical memory lane have been done before, and often better."
Uncut,50,"Gentle on the ears and soft on the heart, Kisses might be of no greater or lesser consequence than an easygoing golf outing among friends or a weekend spent digging a garden near the back fence, but its pleasures, though small and sleepy, can be gratifying."
BBC Music,40,"He has always played it warm and safe, but in this album, he is playing it warmer and safer than ever....Lukewarm this album is, indeed."
The Guardian,40,"His usually formidable voice could have saved it, but he often sounds like he's struggling to hit the notes."
Blurt Magazine,40,"These standards have a lot still to say--if only they sang a little more potently here."
Mojo,40,"The lite-jazz treatment of standards on Kisses on the Bottom seems like a misstep."
Clash Music,30,"Sir Paul McCartney has made an utterly forgettable, featherweight record designed primarily to appeal to Sir Paul McCartney."
American Songwriter,20,"Suggests that McCartney lacks anyone to tell him when he's had a terrible idea."

Consequence of Sound,73,"Three albums in, Boyle sounds like she's finally arriving."
Boston Globe,70,"Someone To Watch Over Me has the makings of a perfectly solid mopey-piano-girl album, largely eschewing chest-beating for a coarser-grained approach that serves the singer rather well."
AllMusic,60,"Her overemphasised enunciation puts Boyle firmly in the Julie Andrews stage show tradition but, at her best, she rises above inoffensive background music to gently brush the emotions."
PopMatters,60,"Boyle isn't an interpreter, necessarily, finding new meanings of songs; instead, the songs are pitched toward her specific skills, so there's an inevitable sameness to her albums, as they all consist of slow, pretty versions of songs you know by heart."
Rolling Stone,50,"She sounds like a showbiz bet marking time. [11 Nov 2011, p.75]"
The A.V. Club,50,"Cut by cut, Someone to Watch Over Me is not as strong as its forerunners."
Chicago Tribune,40,"Boyle's versions are professionally executed but phenomenally dreary."
Drowned In Sound,40,"Boyle has proven herself capable of doing one thing and one thing only, and Someone to Watch Over Me simply doesn't change that."

Los Angeles Times,80,"Exudes warmth. [Dec. 2011 p.94]"
Tiny Mix Tapes,80,"At once understated and innovative, her often-crazed genius makes this album, different from what went before yet in its way a product of it, a pleasure to listen to."
NOW Magazine,80,"Ilo Veyou is a magnificent, kaleidoscopic oddity, unafraid to risk ridiculousness in pursuit of the sublime, fearlessly unlike anything else you'll hear this year."
The Observer (UK),70,"With such an ambitiously unconventional approach, it's quite an achievement that Ilo Veyou contains far more hits than misses."
The Independent (UK),60,"Camille remains a restless, inventive voice, as enchanting as she is silly."
Spin,50,"[In French] it's beguiling and sexy. When she crosses the Channel and sings in English, she's a ten-a-penny kook-merchant."

The Independent on Sunday (UK),80,"Foot-stompingly perfect pop, achieved without sacrificing the folky feel... [However] while there isn't a weak track on the album, they don't always seem particularly well stitched together."
Billboard.com,70,"Peculiar and unconventional, this is an album which constantly shape-shifts and surprises, but does so with a graceful, effortless ease that feels incredibly natural and utterly delightful."
Boston Globe,60,"A Kiss Before You Go has its fingers in so many pies that it's unlikely to be appreciated entirely by many, but listened to in small portions, it's difficult not to be enamored by its inventiveness and inherent avant-garde charm."
The Telegraph (UK),60,"An aural Waltzer, exhilarating and nauseous. On the plus side, there's oompah brass, jaunty jigs and a song channelling Fraggle Rock for vocal inspiration; and on the minus, oompah brass [and] jaunty jigs."

AllMusic,80,"It's a warm, inviting blend, with Asa's husky, lightly swinging vocals its focal point. It's undeniably cosy listening."
Entertainment Weekly,70,"It adds up to a record that's full of charm, but you wonder about its sticking power. Asa still feels like a tremendous talent who could stand to take more risks."
The New York Times,70,"So yes, it's imperfect, and it's frequently beautiful, much like the world itself, yeah? Do you see? Oh, too relaxed to care? Righto."
The Independent on Sunday (UK),60,"Like Sade, she doesn't possess a voice with great range, but she uses it well and smartly maximizes her talents with solid arrangements."
Slant Magazine,60,"Where her self-titled debut was intense and socially conscious, things are groovier now. [May 2011, p.107]"
Mojo,60,"Comparisons are inevitable, but take nothing away from Asa's own character. [Apr 2011, p.75]"
musicOMH.com,60,"The compartmentalization of its exotic elements confirms Beautiful Imperfection as a ploy launched at a specific target market, listeners who want to be gently and non-confrontationally challenged, able to enjoy Asa's spongy neo-soul with the stranger portions served on the side."
The Telegraph (UK),40,"Beautiful Imperfection is never less than easy on the ear, but equally never more than that either. [Apr 2011, p.110]"

AllMusic,83,"Here Babs goes bigger, singing the natural-fiber stuffing out of 10 dramatic tearjerkers by her old pals Alan and Marilyn Bergman."
The Observer (UK),80,"The state of the art recording ensures that this is another unmissable feast of song from an artist seemingly unstoppable in her continuing quest to present something new to her worldwide audience."
The Independent on Sunday (UK),78,"As always, though, Streisand sings the material like it was written expressly for her, elongating phrases at will and slowing most of the tempos to a luxurious Old Hollywood crawl. What matters most? Babs' bliss."
musicOMH.com,75,"Streisand's somber production and emotional vocals evoke melancholy more than joy--a fitting mood for these theatrical but not sentimental songs."
BBC Music,70,"Streisand, who produced it herself, has a soft spot for orchestrations that are just a little too sweet, languid piano balladry, and lilting, midtempo cocktail-hour ambience that would be more fun if it had some swing."
AllMusic,70,"lthough the arrangements and material are monochromatic, What Matters Most isn't a failure by any means, thanks to Barbra Streisand's interpretive skills (as well as her flair for drama and her ever-beautiful voice). That said, this is not a record for those who love precocious Streisand best (Funny Girl, Hello, Dolly!)."
The Independent on Sunday (UK),70,"Some of her high notes may have slipped away, but the body of her instrument has ripened. The overall tone is fairly subdued."

The Guardian,80,"On LP1, Stone mostly imbues her songs with passion and energy."
Boston Globe,75,"Drive All Night, with its chilled-out jazz backbeat, is a standout among her sultry tales of love. [29 Jul 2011, p.72]"
BBC Music,75,"In a world where machined dance fodder, rap-deckled pop and lumbering rawk dominates, a genuine article of soul music-especially one where the thick bass, tumbling Wurlitzer and bright guitars set the tone-is a joyous noise, indeed."
PopMatters,70,"LP1 doesn't always achieve a balance between the two extremes, not to the extent Stone and Stewart desires, as some of the ballads are a little formless and some of the funk a little too restricted, while some of Joss' posturing is a little affected, but it has more moments that work than anything she's done since her actual debut in 2003."
Mojo,70,"Her voice is a loose cannon; LP1 figures out how to aim it."
Uncut,60,"She's got soul all right. [Sept. 2011, p. 94]"
Slant Magazine,60,"There is an occasional excess of histrionics, particularly on 'Boat Yard,' but her teenage talent has found a convincing adult path. [Sep 2011, p.96]"
Q Magazine,60,"This feels more like a palette cleanser, a statement of intent that Stone has ditched the commercial gloss."
Entertainment Weekly,60,"Stone is best when she's rawest, bookending LP1 with 'Newborn' and 'Take Good Care,' stripped-down tunes where her howl goes from plaintive to bone-shaking in a few lovesick heartbeats."
BBC Music,60,"Recorded over six days in Nashville with Dave Stewart, the debut release on Joss Stone's own label is, she claims, the first on which she has exerted total creative freedom."
Billboard.com,60,"The writing is generic, the studio-craft impressive. Enjoyment will depend on how you get on with the voice and its hooting cannonade of mannerisms."
Los Angeles Times,60,"Stone packs all the power you expect, but her control misfires enough for some of these tracks to never quite click as they might."
Boston Globe,50,"LP1 is an almost shockingly forgettable slab of forced adult-contemporary rock, destined for a Whole Foods aisle near you."
AllMusic,50,"The result, surprisingly, is Stone's most conventional record yet: handsome soul singing, sturdy blues-rock arrangements, lyrics about refusing to cry oneself to sleep."
The New York Times,50,"This a wholly acceptable effort, but it makes it clear that Stone is stalling out a mere decade into what looked at first like a promising career. It's time for her to throw the throwback shtick aside and really figure out what kind music she'd like to make."
Boston Globe,40,"Devon soul woman meets Dave Stewart, in Nashville. [Sept. 2011, p. 118]"
Entertainment Weekly,40,"Sadly, the final product is so familiar and so shorn of genuine emotion that LP1 quickly loses any sense of identity and becomes standard fare, indistinguishable from any number of other recordings."
Paste Magazine,40,"While it's impossible to truly define what makes LP1 so frustrating, it's safe to say that through all the angry growls and snoozy pop melodies that color the album, believing is Joss Stone becomes increasingly difficult each time these songs are played."

AllMusic,80,"It's a well-judged mix; safe enough to satisfy the easy-listening end of Peyroux's following, but bold enough to show that among the jazzy, post-Norah crowd, the wayward Maddy stands apart. [Aug 2011, p.83]"
The New York Times,80,"This is a fine, largely original album, give or take a handful of covers of songs by Bob Dylan, Lennon and McCartney, and Robert Johnson, and a couple from a recently kindled composing partnership with the Stones' Bill Wyman."
Mojo,75,"Here their playing [Marc Ribot on guitar and Meshell Ndegeocello on bass] creates some valuable tension beneath Peyroux's still-placid singing."
Uncut,70,"The main signifier is Peyroux's sound, now as downhome as a chicken shack and artfully haunted as a Cassandra Wilson session. Tasteful."
The Telegraph (UK),70,"As an album, Standing on the Rooftop may not be as striking as its predecessor, but perhaps it wasn't meant to be. It is a seemingly effort that pushes the familiar toward an uncertain future where pop genres cease to need to exist at all."
Rolling Stone,63,"Standing on the Rooftop sounds like a self-consciously boho summer album: pleasant enough for a backyard soiree and a bottle of verde, but too breezy to linger once your guests leave."
The Independent (UK),60,"Peyroux's best work may happen beyond the perimeter of her comfort zone. [Aug. 2011, p. 96]"
The Independent on Sunday (UK),40,"Madeleine Peyroux is an artist literally without her own voice. Borrowing from one source heavily and dabblingly from myriad sources, her Standing on the Rooftop is the sound of nothing so much as hip confusion."

BBC Music,70,"While Lopez has claimed that her new public image showcases the real her, she never could pull off the idea of being a real human being with actual emotions on record."
The A.V. Club,60,"After all the processed cheese, though, you're left wondering: What's love got to do with it?"
Los Angeles Times,60,"The real problem, then, is that Love? isn't the all-out dance album it could-and should-have been."
Slant Magazine,50,"Despite the star power she emits on screen, her vocals have always been less than stellar; on LOVE? she often sounds limited and nasal, with a flatness that can feel downright Rebecca Black-esque at its worst."
Q Magazine,42,"In general, though, Love? is as vague and unfocused as its titular inquiry suggests, a musical shrug that seems to mean even less to Lopez than it will to listeners."
The Guardian,40,"An average album over produced, Love? has Lopez throwing everything she's got at relaunching her pop career and coming up shorter than anyone could ever have thought possible."
PopMatters,40,"Given her promotion to the Paula Abdul seat on American Idol, there's a distinct irony in having the first sounds on Jennifer Lopez's Love? all twisted through a vocoder: she may be judging the pop purity of legions of hopeful singers, but even she can't resist the siren call of the computer."
Uncut,40,"The reality of Jennifer Lopez is...blah."
The Guardian,37,"Coming from a star whose weekly 'Idol' pronouncements emphasize the value of charisma, 'Love?' definitely disappoints."

Los Angeles Times,83,"The Israeli-born chanteuse plays Francoise Hardy-esque fille mysterieuse on her husky, atmospheric latest. [8 Apr 2011, p.59]"
The Independent on Sunday (UK),80,"Despite including some familiarly-styled acoustic reflections, 101 is very different to 2007's New York-influenced Keren Ann. [May 2011, p.104]"
AllMusic,80,"Slipping easily between lush orchestral pop and electronic symphonics redolent of Air, she also keeps a firm hand on the lyrical tiller, occasionally even bearing comparison to the poetic pith of Leonard Cohen."
Paste Magazine,80,"101 blends the quirky, the audacious and the touching to confident effect, emerging as a fine listen for all seasons."
Mojo,80,"Keren-Ann Zeidal has been covered by Jane Birkin and Francoise Hardy, but here progresses from chansons to create a spectacularly produced pop-art. [Apr 2011, p.85]"
PopMatters,70,"Each of the songs is a short film: with an atmosphere and a story and a sense of drama. That makes her an artist to whom attention must be paid."
BBC Music,70,"At times, they clearly outpace her singing and lyrics, which often betray the fact that English is a second language. Still, Keren Ann remains a striking songwriter (listen to the interesting device she employs on the title track for proof), while her range of musical techniques has grown."
Boston Globe,62,"At best, the heart found in earlier recordings is missing from Ann's soft voice here. At worst-as in the album closer where she counts down from 101 to 1 in a flat tone-things get downright tedious."
Slant Magazine,60,"Her sense of foreboding remains intact, as does her way with a spooked Portishead-esque rhythm and a keeningly intelligent lyric. [May 2011, p.119]"
Entertainment Weekly,60,"It's partially because Keren Ann has made such a resource of restraint that the cooing, gritty femme-fatale act pursued here seems contrary to her strengths."
The A.V. Club,60,"Keren Ann's languid orchestral pop is suffused with equal parts Parisian lounge, Golden Age of Hollywood, and polished folk song."

Dot Music,80,"All the performances are touched by Haden's instinct for doing the right thing quietly. It hasn't been out front for weeks in the French jazz album charts for nothing."
AllMusic,80,"The repertoire leaves room for instrumental chops from saxophonist Ernie Watts, while Haden's big bass fiddle thumps out the time with authority."
Rolling Stone,80,"The album's concentrated focus on a single mood is relentless. Listening to it from the beginning to the end is like being trapped in a dream with a twisty plot that draws you deeper and deeper into a period Hollywood fantasy of the bad and the beautiful."
Los Angeles Times,70,"Does fall just short at times of mimicking a brand of saccharine faux-post-big-band jazz that flourished in the '50s and early '60s, but Haden and his team are too masterful to allow their tribute to lose its stylishness."
Entertainment Weekly,70,"Sometimes this build-up can establish a cocktail lounge atmosphere, but in most cases its emotional resonances hover on the right side of poignant."
Mojo,70,"The music is consistently smooth and satisfying. If this album was a French pastry, we would all be eating desert for supper."
The Telegraph (UK),60,"If Diana Krall's Goodby and Norah Jones's Ill Wind are strikingly vulnerable, intimate performances of classics, it's perhaps the obscurer selections that stand out. [Feb 2011, p.107]"

BBC Music,100,"Diamond knows just how good these recordings are, as indicated by the terrific autobiographical liner notes he's penned for this collection, notes that give this music context, but they're not necessary to appreciate The Bang Years: this is pop music that's so pure it needs no explanation."
Uncut,100,"Because half these songs are already widely available elsewhere, this collection has slightly less archival impact than the Gentile Elvis's Sun Sessions or last year's widely-circulated Never Mind the Bullets, Here's Early Bob Seger. Musically, though, it's in their league."
PopMatters,80,"This 23-track collection of his formative spell with the New York-based Bang label makes a welcome reminder what a top pop tunesmith Neil Diamond was in his younger, Brill Building days. [Jul 2011, p.126]"
AllMusic,80,"The 23-track set--material oft-mired in legal entanglements--which range from hit for others, to darkly melodic deep catalogue gems. Diamond himself provides highly entertaining liner notes. [Jul 2011, p.82]"
Filter,80,"The Bang Years is the anthology his fans have always craved--the first definitive collection of his Sixties nuggets, when he was just another Brooklyn punk hustling his way into the business with a guitar, groovy sideburns and a solitary-man glare."
Q Magazine,80,"Fans of the man whose Brill Building work helped shape the pop landscape of the mid-60s can enjoy this interesting collection: 23 mono tracks from the period where Diamond was only beginning to make his name as an artist in his own right."

Slant Magazine,80,"The Gate presents Elling at the top of his game; it is a song cycle that is mesmerizing and mysterious as it is provocative and compelling."
Spin,80,"The Gate is an impeccably stylish album that coaxes jazz from unusual sources."
The Guardian,80,"The Gate is fresh but still swinging, pop but plenty-plenty jazz. It is, if you will, Kurt Elling Plus, which seems like a good value in any economy."
The Independent on Sunday (UK),70,"It goes beyond technically supreme homages into the realms of risk-taking and unpredictability. The vibe is nevertheless still every bit as cool, relaxed and controlled as might be expected from Elling. Not everything pays off, but Elling is branching out in courageous style."
The New York Times,60,"While The Gate is not as persuasive as 2007's Nightmoves, the good stuff more than makes up for comparatively effortful takes on Stevie Wonder and EW&F material. [Jun 2011, p.105"
AllMusic,60,"This is an album you admire rather than love."
BBC Music,60,"Despite a version of Earth Wind & Fire's 'After The Love Is Gone' that is so good you can play it for days, this dream-team collaboration between jazz singer Elling and big-time weirdo producer Don Was delivers less than it promises."
PopMatters,60,"His improv ingenuity consistently sidesteps cliches, and The Gate is far from a bland set of adult-contemporary classic-pop covers."

Mojo,80,"Amanda Palmer Goes Down Under is, simply, a lot of fun. Some of that fun might most appeal to the countries it's directed at, but those feeling no particular kinship to Australia or New Zealand will still find Amanda's quirkiness endearing."
AllMusic,80,"It's touching, witty, and like everything else the Bostonian ever does, brilliant."
PopMatters,75,"The whole album feels like an enjoyable trifle cranked out for the hell of it."
Q Magazine,70,"If you ignore the obvious filler and give it time to wash over, Amanda Palmer Goes Down Under is an enjoyable set of songs that will linger long in the memory."
Uncut,70,"This disc may not attract those who have always found Palmer a bit affected and showy. She still is. But she clearly knows how to please an audience and understands the importance of more than just playing to the crowd."
Rolling Stone,60,"For her second solo album, the Dresden Dolls' Amanda Palmer slapped together an album-full of songs about Australia and New Zealand to coincide with her 2011 tour of the Australian continent."

BBC Music,80,"Wilson and her band have created a wonderful and almost seamless set of music that explores a lot of territory and yet still keeps its cohesiveness."
AllMusic,80,"This gifted but sometimes frustrating performer has rarely inhabited her materials so naturally, or put together a tracklist that sounds so powerfully compatible."
BBC Music,80,"As ever, whatever the material, Wilson's smooth but husky-toned vocals are highly distinctive, especially when combined with a delivery that savours every word while remaining loose and languid."
PopMatters,80,"The program for Silver Pony is a balanced mix of originals, standards, and rearranged pop songs."
musicOMH.com,76,"Wilson and her band thrive on musical democracy, where each instrument--even the most famous--gets an equal say in the song."
Mojo,60,"This latest recording, however, does more rehashing than reinventing. It suggests, of course, that Cassandra Wilson remains a vital jazz vocalist and a sterling live performer. But as the latest of the singer's recording projects, it is inessential and merely fine."
The Telegraph (UK),60,"Her uneven but warmly satisfying new album, Silver Pony, attempts the best of both worlds."

The Independent on Sunday (UK),80,"These 18 collaborations are a fascinating voyage through the classier end of pop, country and R&B over the past decade, and also add much needed focus to Jones (sometime insipid) mix of country and smooth jazz. [Jan 2011, p.93]"
The Guardian,80,"This 18-song miscellany reminds us that talent loves the company of talent, one-off duets with Ray Charles and Dolly Parton underlining Jones's seemingly effortless ascent to premier league status. [Jan. 2011, p. 97]"
Delusions of Adequacy,75,"...Featuring doesn't really turn over any new rocks in the Zen garden of Jones' voice, perpetually in repose. It only reinforces her power over and over again--but it's hard to complain when her vocal prowess is so refined."
The Independent on Sunday (UK),75,"Q-Tip brings out a hint of funkiness, Ray Charles nudges her to start bending notes, and Dolly Parton coaxes out her inner twang. A little friskiness suits her well."
The A.V. Club,73,"As a series of off-the-cuff side projects have shown, though, Jones' musical interests are more varied than they might appear, a fact that's demonstrated neatly on '. . . Featuring,' which collects more than a dozen of her collaborations with a wide range of other acts, including Willie Nelson, Belle & Sebastian, OutKast and Foo Fighters."
musicOMH.com,72,"Singing with El Madmo or sampled by Talib Kweli, she doesn't sit comfortably or confidently in every style, but even the less successful forays serve to bust through genre boundaries."
PopMatters,70,"Helpfully rounds up 18 of these guest appearances, including a cut by the Jones-fronted country cabaret outfit the Little Willies, and what impresses is the range of collaborators and the consistency of the music."
AllMusic,70,"It's fair to say that for every misstep there's an unexpectedly winning duet, but not enough of Jones' maturity is brought to the fore."
AllMusic,70,"...Featuring Norah Jones may attempt to cast her in something of a supporting role, but it's still definitively a Norah Jones record, and a solid one at that."
The Guardian,60,"Her collaborations, from Foo Fighters to Ray Charles. [Jan. 2011, p. 151]"
BBC Music,50,"Jones' strengths lie in her collaborations in alt-country."
Boston Globe,50,"The musical equivalent of a coffee table book this is a poised, polished album of covers and collaborations spanning a decade."
Paste Magazine,40,"Ultimately, though, the comp is uneven, and it's difficult to determine the intended audience; fans likely already own these songs."
PopMatters,30,"...Featuring might make a great stocking stuffer for mom, but even she might have trouble swallowing over an hour of Jones; innocuous and predictable soft rock. [Year End 2010, p.77]"

The New York Times,83,"If you can get past lyrics bloated with dark nights and winter moons, Illuminations might be Groban's handsomest effort yet."
Uncut,80,"Smart guy that he is, Rubin doesn't eliminate surging melodrama from Groban's bag of tricks but he does limit and mute the palette, making sure the strings don't soar so high and that the singer doesn't bellow."
Mojo,70,"If not quite a renaissance, Illuminations at least suggests Groban is finally ready to let some more light in."
Los Angeles Times,60,"If Rubin managed to find the core of Groban, it's a sad fact that what remains after the layers have been removed is an incredible vocalist and a one-note songwriter."

Entertainment Weekly,70,"Mostly she and the producer Steve Mac render traditionals--'Auld Lang Syne,' 'O Come All Ye Faithful' and more--in unerringly gorgeous, if wrenchingly polite, arrangements, performances that smooth flat the many creases in Ms. Boyle's sometimes erratic public persona."
Billboard.com,70,"The Gift wins at warming the heart in a time of reflection and recession, ringing subtly--via an impressively less-than-mechanical recipe--in the slushiest part of our brains."
Paste Magazine,66,"The Gift, the second release from famed 'Britain's Got Talent' contestant Susan Boyle, is a bit of a tweener: mostly a holiday album and partly a follow-up to last year's massively successful 'I Dreamed a Dream.'"
AllMusic,60,"There are a couple of songs so overfamiliar that Boyle can do little to revitalise them, including a predictable trudge through 'Auld Lang Syne' and the saccharine overdose of 'Away In A Manger', but Boyle herself once again emerges from trashy circumstances with class intact."
BBC Music,50,"For the most part, The Gift is indeed predictable in its sound--a continuation of the glassy, stately march of I Dreamed a Dream--and songs, relying on carols, not secular seasonal tunes."

Slant Magazine,80,"The minimal recordings (often just voice, guitar and piano) give proceedings an eerie feel, and Diamond's hurting vocals must be among the most emotional he has ever delivered."
Q Magazine,80,"Dreams possesses the charm of a confident man who understands the beauty of pop music and the serious allure of emotional lyrics."
PopMatters,80,"This album is flush with easy-listening ballads, but they are often wondrously rearranged by Diamond, who continues to be a restless experimenter."
Clash Music,70,"In the US they're pitching this as Diamond's revelatory masterpiece, which is a bit rich considering he's performed covers often before, and his own best songs were as strong as anything here."
NOW Magazine,68,"Given his role as one of pop's most respected songwriters, Neil Diamond might be expected to fill a covers album with underappreciated obscurities by tunesmiths less highly regarded than he."
Under The Radar,67,"There's a certain pleasure in hearing him refashion pop history in his sonorous, self-serious style. [Nov. 5, 2010, p. 71]"
Entertainment Weekly,60,"A third Rick Rubin-produced album -- cover versions but the comeback continues. [Jan. 2011, p. 97]"
AllMusic,60,"Diamond's song selection will hardly shake anyone's world  two each by the Beatles and Randy Newman  but he has the vocal power to make many cuts his own."
Boston Globe,60,"As a whole, Dreams is a bleak affair, Diamond sounding often forlorn and beaten, most notably on a morose, slowed down reimagining of his own 1966 tune, I'm A Believer, which became The Monkees' biggest success."
BBC Music,60,"Like most covers sets, this is a mixed bag, and it's for the hardcore Diamond fan more than those who admire Home Before Dark, 12 Songs, or his work from the '60s through the mid-'70s."
The New York Times,58,"There isn't a bad song--well, apart from 'Alone Again (Naturally)'--or a tacky arrangement on the album, but the material suffers from excessive familiarity."
BBC Music,50,"It's such a disappointment when something you hope is going to be great is, well, such a disappointment. That's the case with Dreams, the latest album from Neil Diamond."
Billboard.com,40,"It isn't just that it's (mostly) a covers album, more that so many of the selections are so uninspired. [Jan 2011, p.139]"

Dot Music,60,"Still winging it, still wearing it well. [Dec 2010, p.99]"
AllMusic,50,"Fly Me to the Moon, Rod Stewart's fifth collection of American pop standards, finds him singing such classics as That Old Black Magic, I've Got You Under My Skin, Beyond the Sea, Fly Me to the Moon, and Moon River."
The Guardian,50,"This whole idea might be a little overdone for everybody by now."
PopMatters,40,"'My Foolish Heart' is delivered with some delicacy, 'Sunny Side Of The Street' is playful, and 'Fly Me To the Moon: floats Rod's voice over synth strings and a lazy piano. Otherwise, stick with Sinatra. [Jan 2011, p.103]"

Boston Globe,90,"Again and again, Antony gestures toward a light: a crying light, a swanlight, a luminous impossibility that beckons, ultimately serving only to illuminate the sadness of this world."
BBC Music,85,"Swanlights may not be the best of his works, but it is a welcome excursion along the path of his career."
Billboard.com,83,"Even when Swanlights doesn't always take corporeal form-that looseness also means several of its melodies simply fade into the shadows-Antony's voice remains a spectral wonder."
Entertainment Weekly,80,"The styles that parade their way onto Swanlights would probably be the most noticeably diverse change from what happened on previous albums."
Mojo,80,"Swanlights is seemingly effortless - the mark of a master at work."
NOW Magazine,80,"Swanlights reveals a portrait of the artist looking upward and onward beyond anguish."
musicOMH.com,80,"Swanlights, the fourth full-length by Antony and the Johnsons, reveals that 2009's The Crying Light was a stepping stone that furthered his sophistication as a songwriter, arranger, and singer."
AllMusic,80,"On Swanlights, Antony takes a cue from Hamlet: the purpose of art is to hold a mirror up to nature."
The A.V. Club,80,"Swanlights succeeds exactly where you might not expect it to: Hegarty sounds content, revitalised. This is a record that revels in a sense of joy."
American Songwriter,80,"From yellowed headlines, nature-magazine clippings, marker scribblings, torn paper, even Kurt Cobain's visage, Antony extracts a poignancy that beautifully matches his music."
Q Magazine,80,"All the elements of old are there--his voice, those lyrical hankerings to melt away from the limits of life. [Oct 2010, p.85]"
Mojo,80,"It's a difficult accomplishment, encompassing pop and the avant-garde while also featuring a particularly striking element (in this case, Hegarty's voice); all three are well-represented here."
AllMusic,80,"With his fourth album Swanlights, Antony Hegarty has created his most arresting set of songs to date."
American Songwriter,80,"Death, love, the ghosts they leave behind: these are grand themes, and Hegarty channels their spirit with magical grace. [Nov. 2010, p. 100]"
Uncut,80,"He'll always be too mannered for mainstream acceptance, but there's unarguable brilliance here. [Nov 2010, p.105]"
Tiny Mix Tapes,78,"A remarkable work overall, Swanlights proves-yet again--that this odd duck has always known true beauty."
Prefix Magazine,77,"Swanlights might be Antony's richest album yet, with musical and thematic charms that take their time to take their hold."
The A.V. Club,75,"He captures the otherworldly more often than not. Occasionally, though, the songs overreach or miss some central point."
Delusions of Adequacy,75,"On Swanlights, Hegarty's fourth album under the Antony and the Johnsons moniker, the darkness lifts, and the singer sounds almost buoyant."
Urb,70,"Fans are unlikely to be disappointed, but if you're expecting a new direction, look somewhere else. [Nov 2010, p.52]"
Slant Magazine,70,"Swanlights is less straightforward than his other records and more operatic. It's still astonishingly beautiful."
AllMusic,70,"Hegarty's fourth album strictly follows the template laid down by his previous records: fragile, sombre and wistful, always dominated by that extraordinary tremulous voice, seemingly forever on the brink of bursting into tears."
PopMatters,70,"The challenge for Antony Hegarty is just how best to use that quivering, purring, sobbing, ecstatic, altogether original voice."
BBC Music,70,"A record of beauty and balance, Swanlights cements Hegarty as the transgender: artsy and challenging enough for the Guardian chin-strokers, but with enough hushed melodic wallop to seduce all-comers."
Spin,70,"Familiar themes still surface, with the natural world continuing to loom large in Antony's conscience, but much of Swanlights is ambiguous and less easy to decipher."
Uncut,60,"While the songs of Swanlights play like a logical extension of the progression from the last two albums by Antony and the Johnsons, they also feel like a possible conclusion, and maybe even a necessary one. [Fall 2010, p. 58]"
Dusted Magazine,60,"Swanlights is curiously one-note, occasionally self-indulgent and fails to leave a strong impression. Or perhaps Hegarty's simply raised the bar impossibly high for himself."
Boston Globe,60,"The fourth Antony and the Johnsons  album is more diverse and positive than 2008's The Crying Light, with familiar concerns of death and alienation broadening into family, human bonds, and the joys of love."

Mojo,100,"Here, he and Johns are working with a faultless batch of songs."
Q Magazine,100,"Praise & Blame casts away the extraneous baggage that has weighed down many of Jones's previous recordings and puts the focus squarely on the voice."
Filter,90,"Take those hats off and launch them into the air for one of the most uplifting, career-topping albums anyone could have released, regardless of age."
Pitchfork,83,"On Praise & Blame, the singer revels in gutbucket and gospel, delivering 12 emotionally charged sermon-songs with raw-throated abandon."
Los Angeles Times,83,"Praise & Blame is a stark, soul-probing study in imminent mortality."
Chicago Tribune,80,"Praise & Blame winds up an undeniably excellent album that you're either ready for or you're not."
The Wire,80,"If you've never even considered owning a Tom Jones record before, give Praise & Blame a try. It may well surprise you."
Clash Music,80,"It's grand, and at last Jones the artist is the match of Jones the entertainer."
musicOMH.com,80,"This studly Welsh baritone, now 70, certainly has the voice to make a lean, tough country gospel album."
Rolling Stone,80,"With guest artists like '60s organmeister Booker T. and Americana legends Gillian Welch and Dave Rawlings, Jones and Johns have made a real statement in the same way that Rubin, and of course T Bone Burnett, do almost every time they produce an album. That statement is that the same people who set the bar decades ago for so many of today's acts to measure up to are still making a lot of today's best music. Praise and Blame raises that bar just a little higher."
New Musical Express (NME),80,"Jones has demonstrated with a new album that it's never too late in the game to take an inspiring artistic step forward."
Drowned In Sound,78,"On Praise & Blame, that gusty Northern soul voice sounds as righteous and true as it does when he's operating in the more carnal regions of his catalog."
Under The Radar,70,"Praise & Blame may not inspire much panty-hurling but it might cause open-minded music fans to reappraise Jones's interpretive gifts."
NOW Magazine,60,"It's a gauche mix of church and the rock'n'roll chestnuts he grew up on. Outside Robert Plant, it's hard to see who it'll appeal to."
The Guardian,60,"Fair play to Jones, He's a trier. [Sep 2010, p.96]"
Los Angeles Times,60,"There's nothing here for Jones to be ashamed of. [Sept. 2010, p. 115]"
The Boston Phoenix,50,"With Praise & Blame, Jones dials down the camp and tries to act his age--he turned 70 in June. So what we get is a more refined, more serious Jones, and that's no fun at all."

Dot Music,83,"A one-off that finds Patton remaking Italo-pop standards backed by a 40-piece orchestra, the record is flagrantly enjoyable from first gasp to final croon."
Entertainment Weekly,80,"Dynamic bombast is his specialty, and amazingly, it all fits perfectly within the confines of Italian pop. As outlandish as Mondo Cane is, it all somehow amounts to the most easily digestible thing in Patton's scattered discography."
The A.V. Club,80,"He clearly relishes the heightened emotion of his source material, the album wisely avoiding cheap campiness in favour of respecting the music's rich sense of drama."
AllMusic,80,"While collaborator conductor Aldo Sisillo's orchestrations deserve a healthy dollop of credit for the overall sonic success of the album, Patton's voice is clearly the centerpiece."
musicOMH.com,80,"These songs, penned by such as Ennio Morricone, Mina and Fred Bongusto, have been treated with the utmost respect. Patton has ensured that they are as authentic as possible by employing a 15-strong band together with a 40-piece orchestra."
The Guardian,80,"The Latin syllables are well suited to Patton's croon and snarl, and he attacks Fred Buscaglione's cavalier 'Che Notte!' with relish. [Jul 2010, p.117]"
The New York Times,80,"Mondo Cane is surprising considering how engaging a listen these visits into grandiose operatic profundity really are. [Jul 2010, p.127]"
American Songwriter,75,"It's only now though that Patton's fully manifested his passion project minus the avant-garde overlay--and ironically scoring an unheard-of #2 debut on the Billboard classical chart in the process, possibly the strangest highlight yet of a strange talent's career."
PopMatters,70,"Even if this album is a genre exercise, it's still a very fine one. Mondo Cane pulls no punches, makes no apologies, and is impossible not to enjoy on some level."
Billboard.com,70,"There's a lot of beautiful music to hear and Patton treats it all with an admirer's respect, but there is something about Mondo Cane that reeks of vanity."
Boston Globe,70,"It's little surprise that Mondo Cane is an album that--65 piece orchestra or not--is built around Patton's personality and voice, rather than his lyricism in the traditional sense. It's this continuity which lends it an appeal beyond mere authenticity and curiosity, to the listener prepared to devote a little time and dare I say it, research, into the album's background and source material."
BBC Music,70,"Mondo Cane is a summer-time staple and a faithful reminder that Mike Patton can sing but sadly little else."
Uncut,60,"On one hand, it's hard to take seriously, but there's something disarmingly sincere about the whole thing and it's carried off with expert skill. [26 Jun 2010, p.52]"
Q Magazine,60,"A rewarding curio. [July 2010, p. 128]"
Chicago Tribune,60,"The multifaceted Mr. Patton turns his hand to Italian-language pop songs. [July 2010, p. 95]"
The A.V. Club,60,"Patton has spoken about his interest in revivifying and reinterpreting these songs, but here they sound mostly like Patton songs, affected by the same fascination with the quirks and power of his voice that colors most of his work."
AllMusic,60,"Unlike Patton's previous forays into the experimentalism of John Zorn or Merzbow, Mondo Cane delivers a more conventional set, heavy on romantic strings and swaying nostalgia."

BBC Music,70,"On an album without humor or melodrama, a devotional spirit reigns."
Prefix Magazine,67,"For fans of Boyle's original Britain's Got Talent clip, the result might be a bit of a letdown, especially in snoozily competent versions of 'Daydream Believer' and Madonna's 'You'll See,' which offer none of her jarred-lightning charm."
musicOMH.com,60,"There are some lovely vocal performances here and some well-appointed and understated arrangements. But not one of Boyles versions transcends the original or adds much of an emotional shading, other than a consistent undercurrent of melancholy that makes the album feel increasingly drab."
Uncut,60,"Boyle sings beautifully throughout, delivering more of the same of what she did in her moment in the sun on television. Those won over by Boyle, either her voice or story, will surely be satisfied."
Alternative Press,50,"Boyle is perfectly comfortable singing actual hymns like 'Amazing Grace,' though her take on them is pretty much on a level with any local church's choir star. She's at her worst when she pushes harder; she doesn't know how to build drama, and her throat seems to constrict as she reaches for bigger notes."
Lost At Sea,40,"The earnest piano arrangements and Boyle's tender but colourless readings of 12 familiar songs will undoubtedly be bliss to fans of musical theatre; anyone else will be gnawing the sleeve in frustration after five minutes."
PopMatters,40,"I Dreamed a Dream finds Ms. Boyle casting about for some kind of musical identity."
No Ripcord,30,"Because the songs are so riddled with cliches and are largely too familiar, and because the music is so tepid and tasteful to a fault, the album simply isn't able to overcome that lack of depth."

Drowned In Sound,85,"And as on 'Idol,' that aesthetic is most appealingly expressed here in the material that seems the least suited for it-i.e., mushy heartland rock ballads."
Sputnikmusic,75,"In context, it all has a giddy sort of ''let's put on a show'' charm; ?on record, it's basically fancy (albeit fun) karaoke."
Kerrang!,70,"Not all Glee members are created equal--Cory Monteith (the show's hunky football captain) and Dianna Agron (the alternately caustic and vulnerable head cheerleader) can't sing nearly as well as their co-stars--but this soundtrack has enough star power to keep things trucking along, especially when powerhouse alto Lea Michele takes the wheel."
Q Magazine,70,"No-one will be disappointed by a Glee album which includes 'Dont Stop Believin'--their chart-eating cover of the Petra Haden arrangement of the Journey song; or 'Alone,' or 'Gold Digger.' But its a shame there wasnt room for their Winehouse-approved upgrade of 'Rehab;' or the stripped-back swing at Bel Biv Devoes 'Poison,' as performed by the shows all-male vocal group Acafellas. These would probably have lifted the second half of the CD, which loses some of the sparkle and joy once the barn-storming 'Somebody to Love' has finished."
Mojo,60,"In fairness, not all the album's highlights require the listener to temporarily imagine that they're listening to a high-school choir....More often, though, if you're prepared to buy into the conceit, Glee: the Soundtrack almost lives up to its title."
Slant Magazine,50,"Star Matthew Morrison couldn't rap his way out of a 98 rehearsal. But Amber 'Mercedes' Riley crushes Jazmine Sullivan's 'Bust Your Windows,' and the Gleeks' 'Don't Stop Believin'' is a triumphal moment against which resistance is futile."
Tiny Mix Tapes,40,"In the end, theres nothing completely surprising or revolutionary about anything on the soundtrack."
The New York Times,40,"Itll no doubt be lapped up by impressionable 14 year old girls the world over, but for a show that has so much more to offer this just smacks of studio exec. cash-in."

Entertainment Weekly,80,"Michael Buble is a master at juggling musical attitudes, and his new CD, Crazy Love, whose title comes from the Van Morrison song, is his most confident balancing act yet."
Boston Globe,80,"Easily the singer's most stylistically wide-ranging album, it is also one of his brightest, poppiest, and most fun."
AllMusic,79,"Crazy Love is another step in Buble's creation of his own kind of songbook, and there's nothing necessarily crazy about that"
Los Angeles Times,75,"The neoRat Pack crooner makes a few too many soft-rock concessions on his new studio disc, Crazy Love."
The Guardian,70,"What does it mean when a crooner of the Great American Songbook is at his best on original tunes?"
PopMatters,50,"The album's polished, middle-of-the-road approach isn't exactly for everyone, but its agreeable heart doesn't hit any sour notes, either."

Slant Magazine,90,"The overall effect is that this is one of the Streisand albums most appealing to her fans and her potential fans--which includes nearly everyone who appreciates a singer singing like she's lived every line of her songs."
Billboard.com,83,"Not exactly galvanizing stuff, but the woman still sings like buttah."
Entertainment Weekly,80,"Streisand gives her trademark romantic-ballad treatment to 13 well-known standards."
AllMusic,80,"At 67, Streisands gorgeous tones and powers of interpretation are utterly intact, and also front-and-center thanks to producer Diana Kralls class-conscious pairing of her own understated quartet with Johnny Mandels velvety orchestrations."
BBC Music,80,"In truth, despite Diana Krall as producre and accompanist, this is hardly jazz. Instead, it's another nigh faultless array of ballads, immaculately dressed by arranger Johnny Mandel (a deluxe edition has backings by Krall's quartet.0 [Dec 2009, p. 92]"
The Guardian,60,"Nevertheless, the album is really a reprofiled Streisand set for her fans, rather than an unexpected diversion for jazz ones."


Rolling Stone,83,"He takes songs easy without throwing them away, and these were written to hold up their end of that bargain."
PopMatters,83,"Produced by renowned adult contemporary producer Tommy LiPuma, American Classic-Nelson's finest album since 1998's 'Teatro'-contains 12 timeless melodies that bridge the gap between Nelson's love for Django Reinhardt and Bob Wills & His Texas Playboys."
Drowned In Sound,80,"American Classic really shines when the velveteen smoothness takes a backseat to that voice. [Sep 2009, p.90]"
The New York Times,80,"At the age of 76, the Texas native proves that there is still plenty of stardust left under his cowboy hat."
AllMusic,78,"The familiar tenor slips in easily with the woozy horns and smooth pianos, sounding confident and at ease--appropriate for the king of cool."
Billboard.com,75,"Where 1978s seminal Stardust was a major statement about the timeless power of a great song, the self-consciously minor American Classic is more of a breezy, diverting aside."
Entertainment Weekly,70,"The resultant sound is smooth, classy, and subtle--a sonic horse of a different color from the exquisitely ramshackle earthiness that made 'Stardust' so appealing and unusual."
Boston Globe,70,"Its sound is lustrous, its personnel impeccable. Whats missing is the sense of conviction that Mr. Nelson brings to his strongest work."
Los Angeles Times,70,"Standards collections from pop artists are de rigueur and Nelsons trusty touring band has been replaced by a tasteful cocktail-jazz unit. For those reasons, American Classic doesnt make the indelible mark its predecessor did."
AllMusic,60,"If not on the same level as 'Stardust,' American Classic nonetheless finds Nelson sounding as soulful and youthful as he has in years."
Entertainment Weekly,60,"For all his genius, Nelson can be kind of lazy, and this disc--a sequel of sorts to his beloved 1978 standards collection, 'Stardust'--he only occasionally sounds like he's trying."
Billboard.com,40,"American Classic still can't avoid feelling like dinner party music. [Fall 2009, p.74]"
Boston Globe,40,"Nelson's debut on seminal jazz imprint Blue Note lacks the luster of its 1978 counterpart."
Mojo,40,"Even taking into consideration his relentless tour schedule, which may be taking its toll on the 76-year-olds vocals, certain performances sound like a man going through the motions."

The Guardian,80,"A model of crisp economy and deep craft, Gardot's singular vision spans bossa nova ('Les Etoile'), blues ('Who Will Comfort Me'), noir ('Your Heart Is as Black as Night'), art song ('The Rain'), and a fistful of romantic ballads that are at once timeless and thrillingly original."
MSN Consumer Guide (Robert Christgau),80,"Her hushed, velvet-smooth vocals evoke a noir yearning and forlornness, her slow-burn delivery enraptures with a torch sentimentality, and her support team shines."
Billboard.com,80,"These are slight, subtle progressions but what impresses is how thoroughly My One and Only Thrill lives up to the promise of her debut, offering another album that is as enchanting in its sound as it is in its substance."
Mojo,80,"Gardot's torch ballads smoulder intensely. [Apr 2009, p.103]"
Prefix Magazine,70,"She deserves credit for creating an album this focused, even at the cost of vigor."
Filter,60,"Gardot's wistful, breathy voice belies her youth and the unobtrusive competence of this album effortlessly belies the difficulties she has striven to overcome."
The A.V. Club,60,"This followup to her successful Worrisome Heart is mostly wistful, sometimes strings-accompanied originals."
AllMusic,60,"Gardot mixes jazz and R&B with elegant string arrangements and acoustic guitars to beguiling, small-hour effect. [Mar 2009, p.98]"
The New York Times,60,"My One and Only Thrill, in its insistently slow tempos and heavy-heartedness, resists a full embrace."
Boston Globe,60,"Melody Gardot actually makes a better album than Shakin' Stevens and Peyroux with My One And Only Thrill. [Apr 2009, p.82]"

Slant Magazine,91,"The singer/songwriter takes the back seat and lets the college kids channel their inner Folds, and they successfully do so--often stealing the spotlight away from Folds."
Rolling Stone,70,"The singer's material is tackled competently and faithfully throughout, resulting in a collection of tracks that are pleasant if not particularly earth-shattering (an admittedly tall task for a musical genre that lacks subwoofers)."
Under The Radar,67,"The disc is little more than a footnote in Folds aggressively eclectic career, but its a surprisingly vital, intriguing one."
Austin Chronicle,60,"The performances are hit-or-miss--and many of them are trumped by Folds' own pair of songs--but the originality remains fairly consistent, yielding an album that should delight a cappella enthusiasts and, at the very least, interest the average Folds fan."
PopMatters,60,"Like any compilation, Ben Folds Presents: University A Cappella has its ups and downs. The good definitely outweighs the bad here, though, and is a worthwhile listen for any big fan of Folds."
Boston Globe,50,"In the end, though, this is an unnecessary album that only clutters Folds's discography."

Billboard,88,"Ogerman charts emphasize minor keys, creating a moody emotional palette for the album. And, as usual, Krall's honeyed voice and carefully chiseled playing are as spare and perfect on every cut as her core quartet's accompaniment."
AllMusic,83,"Ogerman might be the only arranger alive who can make an overstuffed orchestra sound so distant and wistful, and Krall, suddenly channeling Julie London, is the taciturn symphony's whispery match."
Mojo,80,"Quiet Nights is still a gorgeous wallow in high-gloss pop romanticism."
The New York Times,80,"Tapping into the sensuous mode of such classic divas of desire as Julie London and Peggy Lee, Diana Krall is at her most seductive on this bossa nova-flavored collaboration with Claus Ogerman."
musicOMH.com,80,"Standards given a sensual bossa makeover"
The Guardian,80,"The result is fabulous, Ogerman framing Krall's sultry, languorous delivery with arrangements that are opulent yet don't swamp her voice. [Jul 2009, p.93]"
Q Magazine,70,"There may be a bit too much classic good taste on Quiet Nights--there is no reinterpretation, only homage--but that's not quite a problem because Krall knows enough to lay back, to never push, only to glide upon the gossamer surface."
PopMatters,70,"The line between dreamy and sleepy is a fine one, and many jazz singers have fallen on the wrong side of it when attempting bossa nova. Diana Krall, however, negotiates it skillfully on Quiet Nights, her first album of all bossas."
Uncut,63,"While fans looking for a classic, none-too-jarring soundtrack for a romantic evening surely will follow this record happily into their good night, Krall has offered us more than that in the past."
Paste Magazine,60,"A so-so collection of lushly orchestrated Brazilian bossa novas and ballads that unite Mrs. Costello with Frank Sinatra's arranger claus Ogerman. [Apr 2009, p.82]"
Boston Globe,60,"As if fearing she might be overtaken in the sweet-nothings department by the even more whispery newcomer Melody Gardot, Krall here breathes her way through an entire album of songs about love and loss, mostly restricting herself to a smoky middle register--with a little samba-sensuality on the side."
The A.V. Club,50,"Quiet Nights contains a few surprises, even if they are dressed up in slow finery."

AllMusic,88,"Every song, no matter how familiar, is transformed by one detail or another."
PopMatters,80,"It's one of this enigmatic artist's most satisfying albums in a long time."
Prefix Magazine,80,"Naturalism is the idea, but this is a beautifully constructed record, from Mr. Morans blenderized, genre-defying piano solos to Ms. Wilsons judicious phrasing, using the full range of her double-smoked voice."
The Boston Phoenix,80,"Whether rollicking through 'St. James Infirmary' or reflecting on 'Wouldn't It Be Loverly,' Wilson is in top-form, always sounding quite loverly."
Entertainment Weekly,80,"She reinvents the standards songbook in her image, using her deep, husky, Malboro-burnished voice to breathe life intro hackneyed old showtunes. [July 2008, p.115]"
The New York Times,80,"Like other recent albums, this is not consistent enough to be classic Wilson but her voice still regularly seduces. [July 2008, p.109]"
Hartford Courant,80,"Her voice, dark, nuanced and full of mystery, shows what a class act the singer has become."
Observer Music Monthly,80,"Loverly proves once again that she needs no artifice to soar musically. [July 2008, p.60]"
Mojo,70,"Loverly is the only reason to avoid imposing a moratorium on the very tired standards genre that has become the bane of jazz in recent years. It cannot be recommended highly enough."
AllMusic,70,"As always, Wilson loves to toy with melody and phrasing, a penchant that often yields delicious results."
Boston Globe,60,"Interpreter extraordinaire Cassandra Wilson embraces a cool dozen standards, although, unfortunately, the overall taste is not quite as cool. [Summer 2008]"
Los Angeles Times,60,"The subtle rhythms of Nigerian percussionist Lekan Babalola giving something new to Wilson's versions of great old songs. [Aug 2008, p.145]"

Uncut,75,"Her voice isn't quite the nasty snarl it once was, but the attitude remains. [1/5/2001, p.70]"
The Guardian,70,"Though not as raw as the original versions, due mainly to the sometimes overly polished production of her sons Donto James and Sametto James, Etta's raw voice alone helps to retain the melancholy moods of these tales of lost love, strife, and movin' on."
PopMatters,70,"A solid return to roots, Matriarch of the Blues finds Etta James reclaiming her throne -- and defying anyone to knock her off it."
The Boston Phoenix,60,"Though many of the songs here are associated with male artists, James usually succeeds in injecting her own womanly strength and style into her renditions, making the tunes indisputably her own."
The Guardian,60,"For all its merits, though, Matriarch is enjoyable but not quite the transcendent experience its title would suggest."

